<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88603-0016 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-03-88.f2.A1015</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 53, No. 107, Friday, June 3, 1988 / Rulesand Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Food and Nutrition Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">7 CFR Part 250 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Donation of Food for Use in the United States, Its Territories andPossessions and Areas Under Its Jurisdictions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Food and Nutrition Services, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Interim rule with request for comments.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This interim rule will amend the Food Distribution Programregulations (7 CFR Part 250) by: (1) Strengthening provisions for inventorycontrols, use of program funds, audits, storage facilities and managementevaluation reviews; (2) restructuring to provide for greater ease in thereading and understanding of the regulations; and (3) revising provisionsfor the renewal of agreements. Those provisions relative to the processingof donated food which appeared on July 1, 1986 (51 FR 23719-24130) andJuly 2, 1987 (52 FR 24937-24978) in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>are included to provide for a complete versionof the Food Distribution Program regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Interim rule effective July 5, 1988, comments must be receivedon or before November 30, 1988. Comments are not being solicited on andSection;andSection;250.11(a), 250.15(c), 250.15(f)(1), 250.16(a)(4) (last sentence), 250.17(c),250.17(b), 250.18(b), 250.18(c), 250.19(b)(2) and 250.30 and the definitionsof ``contract value of the donated foods,'' ``Federal acceptance service,''``multi-State processor,'' ``refund application,'' ``substituted food''and ``substitution'' as contained in andSection; 250.3.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Susan E. Proden, Chief, Program Administration Branch,Food Distribution Division, Food and Nutrition Service, Park Office Center,Alexandria, Virginia 22302.Comments in response to this interim rule may be inspected at the addressabove during normal business hours (8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Monday throughFriday).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Susan E. Proden, Chief, ProgramAdministration Branch (703) 756-3660.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Classification </ITAG>This action has been reviewed under Executive Order 12291 and has not beenclassified major because it does not meet any of the three criteria identifiedunder the Executive Order. This action will not have an annual effect onthe economy of $100 million or more nor will it result in a major increasein costs or prices for consumers, individual industries, Federal, Stateor local government agencies, or geographic regions. This action will nothave significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.  This rule has been reviewed with regard to the Regulatory Flexibility Act(5 U.S.C. 601-612). Anna Kondratas, Administrator of the Food and NutritionService, has certified that this action will not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities. The reporting and recordkeepingrequirements contained in this rule have been approved by the Office ofManagement and Budget in accordance with the requirements of the PaperworkReduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3507). The OMB approval numbers are notedat the relevant point of the regulations.The Department is issuing this rule as an interim rule rather than a finalrule. The Department has already solicited and considered public commentsconcerning this rulemaking effort. In a typical rulemaking, the Departmentwould now issue a final rule. However, because this rulemaking involvesextensive modifications to program operations, the Department has determinedthat additional public comments would be beneficial. Therefore, we areissuing this rule as an interim rule in order to provide distributing agenciesand recipient agencies with the opportunity to comment based on actualoperating experience with the new regulations.Since the provisions that pertain to processing were published in finalon July 1, 1986 (51 FR 23719-24130) the Department is not soliciting commentson andSection;andSection; 250.17(b), 250.17(c), 250.18(b), 250.18(c), 250.19(b)(2)and 250.30 and the definitions of ``contract value of the donated foods,''``Federal acceptance service,'' ``multi-State processor,'' and ``refundapplication'' as contained in Section 250.3 of this rule. Similarly, sincecomments have already been solicited on the provisions concerning the substitutionof concentrated skim milk for nonfat dry milk under State processing contractswhich were published as an interim rule on July 2, 1987 (52 FR 24973-24978),no additional comments are being solicited on the last sentence of andSection;250.16(a)(4) and the definitions of ``substituted food'' and ``substitution''as contained in andSection; 250.3 of this rule. In addition, andSection; 250.15(c)(claims), andSection; 250.15(f)(1) (use of funds accruing from claims) andandSection; 250.21 (civil rights) were reserved in the proposed rule. Thecurrent regulatory provisions concerning claims and use of funds accruingfrom claims have been inserted into this rule at these sections to providea complete version of Food Distribution Program regulations. However, anychanges to these two provisions will be addressed in a separate rulemaking.Since these provisions reflect the current regulation, no comments arebeing solicited on them at this time.The civil rights section has been amended to provide cross references tothe Departmental regulations on civil rights. Comments on this sectionand all other provisions of this rule will be considered in the developmentof final regulations.The Department also wishes to point out that this rule does not reflectany of the changes required by the recently enacted Commodity DistributionReform Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-237). The Department will be issuing regulationsconcerning this Act in the near future.This program is listed in the Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance underNo. 10.550 and is subject to the provisions of Executive Order 12372 whichrequires intergovernmental consultation with State and local officials.(7 CFR Part 3015, Subpart V, and final rule related notice 48 FR 29114(June 24, 1983)).<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>The regulations governing the Food Distribution Program (7 CFR Part 250)outline the responsibilities of the Food and Nutrition Service (FNS) anddistributing agencies concerning the distribution and use of federallydonated foods. The current regulations provide for the distribution ofdonated foods to a variety of domestic outlets, including entities participatingin the child nutrition programs and nutrition programs for the elderly,charitable institutions, nonprofit summer camps for children, and certainlow-income households and disaster organizations.<ITAG tagnum="84">Analysis of Comments</ITAG>On August 19, 1985, FNS published a proposed rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (50 FR 33470) to amend the Food DistributionRegulations (7 CFR Part 250) by: (1) Strengthening provisions for inventorycontrols, use of program funds, audits, storage facilities and managementevaluation reviews; (2) restructuring to provide for greater ease in thereading and understanding of the regulations; and (3) revising provisionsfor the renewal of agreements; and strengthening provisions for the processingof donated foods.In an effort to assist FNS in revising Part 250, comments were solicitedon the proposed changes. The proposed revision encompassed nearly all provisionscontained in Part 250. Comments were not solicited on the regulations regardingthe National Commodity Processing Program, which were subsequently movedto 7 CFR Part 252 and three provisions, claims (andSection; 250.15(c)), useof funds accruing from claims (andSection; 250.15(f)(1)), and civil rights(andSection; 250.21) were reserved for further consideration and developmentprior to proposal.The general public was given 90 days for comment on the proposed revision.A total of 305 comment letters was received from various sources such asdistributing agencies, recipient agencies, processors, distributors ofprocessed end products, the American School Food Service Association, theNational Association of State Agencies for Food Distribution and the AmericanInstitute of Certified Public Accountants.RestructuringIn an effort to simplify the organization of Part 250, the proposed ruleset forth the provisions under one part with separate subparts for: (1)General, (2) General Operating Provisions, (3) Processing and Labelingof Donated Foods, and (4) Eligible Recipient Agencies and Programs. Therestructuring was intended to provide greater ease in reading and understandingof the regulations and to eliminate the need for a significant amount ofrepetition. The commenters overwhelmingly supported the restructuring ofthe regulations, as proposed. Thus, the interim rule is issued in the sameformat as the proposed rule.The exerpts of legislative provisions were deleted in the proposed rule.However, summaries of section 4(a) of the Agriculture and Consumer ProtectionAct of 1973, as amended; sections 6 and 14 of the National School LunchAct, as amended; section 32 of Pub. L. 74-320, as amended; section 311of the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended; section 416 of the AgriculturalAct of 1949, as amended; and section 709 of the Food and Agriculture Actof 1965, as amended; were included under definitions. These are the primarylegislative provisions authorizing the purchase and donation of food items.A few commenters were concerned about the elimination of the legislativequotations. It is the Department's opinion that a lengthy list of the fulltext of these provisions is unnecessary since a summary of the primaryprovisions relative to the purchase and donation of food for distributionto eligible recipient agencies is being retained under the definitionssection. FNS will, however, make available a summary of all legislativeauthorities upon request.Definitions``Distributing agency''_Although the Department has always considered indiantribal organizations (ITOs) to be inherent in the definition of a ``distributingagency,'' the Department is concerned that confusion may result from thelack of specific reference. In order to clarify this matter, the interimrule definition specifically refers to ITOs. ``Nonresidential Child CareCenters''_In andSection; 250.3 of the proposed rule the term ``nonresidentialchild care centers'' included reference to child care centers, day carehomes and sponsoring organizations. In the interim rule, reference is madeto ``institution'' instead. This term more accurately describes the entitieswhich participate in the Child Care Food Program. The proposed definitionunnecessarily included day care homes, which can only participate underthe auspices of a sponsoring organization and failed to include outside-school-hourscare centers.``School''_is amended by revising the definition to reflect recent changesto the term in the National School Lunch Program. The changes consist ofclarifying the eligibility of preprimary classes for the National SchoolLunch Program, and clarifying that school means an education unit of highschool grade or under which is recognized as part of the education systemin the State.``Tuition''_As a result of the elimination of tuition limitation by Pub.L. 100-71, the tuition limitation in the definition of ``school'' and thedefinition of ``tuition'' have been deleted.``School food authority''_is amended to reflect changes to the definitionin the National School Lunch Program regulations which were necessary torecognize special accommodations between public schools and private schoolsor residential child care institutions, when approved by FNS.``Substituted food'' and ``Substitution''_are new or expanded terms thatappeared in the interim concentrated skim milk substitution rule whichwas published July 2, 1987 at 52 FR 24973. These terms are included inthis rule to provide a complete text. No comments are being taken on thesedefinitions in this rulemaking.Eligibility Determinations for Recipient Agencies and RecipientsSection 250.11 of the proposed rule required that distributing agenciesdetermine the eligibility of all applicants, enter into agreements withthose which were determined to be eligible and make donated foods available.A total of twenty comments was received on this requirement. Ten commenterswere opposed to the provision. They maintained that requiring the distributingagency to determine the eligibility of and make donated foods availableto all eligible organizations which apply for participation in the TemporaryEmergency Food Assistance Program (TEFAP) was not feasible due to the limitedamounts of donated foods which are currently being provided. The Departmentdid not intend for this provision to apply to TEFAP. Agreements betweendistributing agencies and emergency feeding organizations are governedby andSection; 251.2 of this subchapter, not andSection; 250.11.Commenters also recommended that they be allowed to impose minimum sizerequirements on recipient agencies. That is, commenters said they shouldhave the authority to reject applications from very small organizationssince the cost of administering the program to such organizations couldbe very high compared to the amount of commodities to be received. TheDepartment does not believe that it is appropriate for a distributing agencyto reject any recipient agency by establishing a minimum number of personswhich a recipient agency must serve in order to receive donated foods.Rather, the Department considers the recipient agency's past performancepractices to be the only justification for denying participation. Thus,this provision is retained in Section 250.11 of the interim rule with theclarification that in determining recipient agency eligibility that theagency's past performance be a factor in the determination. The Department published a new andSection;250.11 regarding the verificationof recipient agency eligibility on June 30, 1986 (51 FR 23518). However,the terms ``State distributing agency'' and ``State agency'' were inadvertentlyused in this section rather than ``distributing agency.'' Since the Part250 regulations use the term ``distributing agency,'' we are replacingthe words ``State distributing agency'' and ``agency'' with ``distributingagency'' to maintain consistency. The provisions of the June 30, 1986 ruleand the proposed andSection;250.11 have been redesignated as andSection;250.11(a) and (b), respectively. Agreements <T3>Agreements with Department</T3>_Section 250.12(a) of the proposed rulerequired distributing agencies to enter into an agreement with the Departmentprior to the beginning of a distribution program. The agreement was tobe completed by September 30 of each year and be effective for no longerthan one year. The same requirement applies to State Agencies on Agingwhich receive any cash in lieu of commodities in connection with nutritionprograms for the elderly. A total of eight comments was received from distributing agencies regardingthis provision. Five commenters opposed the requirement on the basis thatthe provision generated more paperwork and that the completion date conflictedwith most school calendars. Since agreements are currently required annually, the only change in theproposal was that agreements be completed by September 30. As noted inthe preamble of the proposed rule, the September 30 requirement was addedto make the term of these agreements coincide with the fiscal year, facilitatingcompliance with reporting requirements which are generally on a fiscalyear basis. Therefore, andSection;250.12(a) of this interim rule retainsthe provision as proposed. <T3>Distributing Agency Agreement</T3>_Section 250.12(b) of the proposedregulations required that the agreements between distributing agencies,subdistributing agencies, recipient agencies, warehouses, carriers, etc.be in writing and be effective for no longer than one year. Forty-three comments were received on this proposal. Thirty one commentersindicated that the requirement for an annual agreement would be time consuming,substantially increase workload and paperwork, tax an already insufficientstaff, and detract from operational flexibility. Distributing agenciesadministering more than one program indicated that they need the flexibilityof writing one agreement to cover a variety of programs. In response to the commenters concerns, andSection;250.12(b) of the interimrule has been modified to permit the one year agreements to be extendedat the option of both parties, for two additional one-year periods. Asa part of each extension, the party contracting with the distributing agencymust update all pertinent information and demonstrate that all donatedfoods received during the previous contract period have been accountedfor. In order to ensure program integrity in light of the three-year contractcycle, contracts must include a termination clause whereby either partymay terminate the agreement for cause with 30 days notice. The provision regarding two one-year extensions of contracts does not applyto existing contracts. It applies only to contracts signed after the effectivedate of this rule. It is generally the policy of the Department not toapply a rule retroactively. In the case of agreements with subdistributingagencies and recipient agencies, the two extension options will reducepaperwork and workload. In the case of agreements for warehouses, etc.,the option for two one-year extensions will mean that the distributingagency will need to engage in procurement procedures for that contractonly once every three years. The Department believes that this three-yearbidding cycle will reduce paperwork and provide added stability with respectto the contracted services, while maintaining adequate assurances thatthe procurement is conducted in a manner that provides open and free competition.Also a new sentence has been added to andSection;250.12(b) to clearly specifythe distributing agencies' ongoing responsibility for ensuring programintegrity at the subdistributing agency level, and below. <T3>Food Service Management Company Agreement</T3>_Section 250.12(c) ofthe proposed regulations required that recipient agencies enter into writtenagreements with food service management companies and that the agreementsbe effective no longer than one year. Nine comments were received on this proposal. Commenters were concernedthat this requirement to limit the agreement to one year was inconsistentwith the National School Lunch Program (NSLP) regulations with respectto the duration of food service management company contracts. The Department did not intend to create inconsistencies with existing regulationsconcerning food service management companies. Instead, the objective wasto ensure accountability when food service management companies use donatedfoods in the preparation of meals under their contracts with recipientagencies. In the case of food service management company agreements withrecipient agencies which participate in the Child Nutrition Programs, thisprovision was intended only to add some requirements concerning the useof commodities and not to create an inconsistency concerning the lengthof contracts. Therefore, this interim rule has been revised to limit theprovision concerning contract length to those recipient agencies whichdo not participate in the Child Nutrition Programs: nonprofit summer campsfor children, charitable institutions, and nutrition programs for the elderly.In addition, the interim rule has been modified to permit the one-yearagreements to be extended at the option of both parties, for two additionalone-year periods. As a part of each extension, the recipient agency andfood service management company must update all pertinent information anddemonstrate that the full value of all donated foods received during theprevious contract period have been accounted for. In order to ensure programintegrity in light of the potential three-year contract cycle for charitableinstitutions, nutrition programs for the elderly and nonprofit summer campsfor children, agreements with these recipient agencies must include a terminationclause whereby either party may terminate the agreement for cause with30 days notice. The provision regarding two one-year extensions of contractsdoes not apply to existing contracts with food service management companies.It applies only to food service management company contracts signed afterthe effective date of this rule. It is generally the policy of the Departmentnot to apply a rule retroactively. Finally, a cross-reference to the reviewrequirements in andSection;250.19(b) has been added. Transfer of Donated FoodsSection 250.13(a)(1) of the proposed rule required that recipient agenciesreceive authorization from the distributing agency and the appropriateFNSRO prior to transferring donated foods which have been provided as partof an approved food package or authorized program level of assistance andcontinued to require distributing agency approval of all other transfers.In addition, the proposed rule required all transfers to be documentedon the FNS-155 or FNS-152.Eighty-six comments were received on this proposed requirement. Some commentersfelt the provision was overly burdensome and costly. Other commenters feltthat the dual authorization requirement could result in food spoilage beforethe transfer could be made. Commenters recommended among other things that:(1) FNSRO approval be required only for those transfers made to recipientagencies not originally authorized to receive that particular donated food;(2) approval not be required for transfers made between like recipientagencies; (3) approval be based on the value of the donated food beingtransferred; and (4) documentation be made available during reviews inlieu of requiring advance approval. Subsequent to the proposed rule, sections 1564(a) and 1561 of Pub. L. 99-198(the Food Security Act of 1985) authorized the Secretary to use commoditiesmade available under section 32 of Pub. L. 74-320 (7 U.S.C. 612c) in theTemporary Emergency Food Assistance Program and amended section 32 to permitthe transfer of section 32 commodities among the agencies originally receivingthose donated foods. On May 13, 1987 (52 FR 17928), the Department publisheda final rule amending both the Food Distribution and TEFAP regulationsregarding the transfer of section 32 commodities. This rule permits thetransfer of section 32 commodities from Part 250 recipient agencies toPart 251 emergency feeding organizations and vice versa. Such transfersmust be approved by both the distributing agency and the State agency administeringthe TEFAP, and must be documented in a manner that provides an audit trail.In light of the concerns raised by the commenters on this provision, theDepartment is revising andSection; 250.13(a)(1) in this interim rule to allowfor transfer of donated foods which have been provided as part of an approvedfood package or authorized program level of assistance between like recipientagencies (schools to schools) with prior approval by only the distributingagency. The Department believes that permitting transfers of this classof donated foods between like recipient agencies with only the distributingagency's approval will give the distributing agency flexibility in administeringthe program while ensuring that ineligible recipient agencies do not receivethe donated foods. However, the transfer of donated foods which have beenprovided as part of an approved food package or authorized program levelof assistance between unlike recipient agencies (schools to charitableinstitutions), must be approved by the appropriate FNSRO. This rule adoptsthe provision of the proposed rule that transfers of donated food whichare provided <T3>in addition </T3>to the authorized program level of assistance maybe transferred between recipient agencies with the prior authorizationof the distributing agency alone. The necessary authorization for the transfer of section 32 commoditieswill depend on whether the section 32 commodities have been provided asa part of the authorized program level of assistance. The transfer of section32 commodities from recipient agencies to TEFAP emergency feeding organizationswill continue to be governed by the requirements set forth in the May 31,1987 rule and incorporated into this rule (prior authorization of the distributingagency and the TEFAP State agency and documentation sufficient to providean audit trail). It has also come to the Department's attention that there is some confusionregarding the conditions on the transfer of commodities by summer campsat the end of the camping session. While the Department anticipates thatthere would be no commodities remaining at the end of the camping session,it should be noted that should there be remaining commodities, these maybe transferred to other recipient agencies with the approval of the distributingagency. In an effort to reduce the paperwork burden which would result from therequirement of the proposed rule that all transfers be documented on FNS-155or FNS-152, the interim regulation requires only that transfers be documentedin any manner that provides an audit trail. Such documentation must beretained in accordance with the recordkeeping requirements of andSection;andSection;250.16 and 251.10(a). In addition, section 1506 of Pub. L. 99-198 amended section 4(b) of theFood Stamp Act to eliminate the current ban on the distribution of Federallydonated foods directly to households in jurisdictions that operate theFood Stamp Program. Accordingly, this prohibition has been deleted fromandSection; 250.13(a)(1) of this interim rule. Storage Facilities <T3>Standards_</T3>Section 250.14(a) of the proposed rule outlined generalstandards for storage facilities and required distributing agencies, subdistributingagencies and recipient agencies responsible for the contracting of storagefacilities to ensure that warehouse facilities meet existing Federal, Stateor local health department standards, whichever were more stringent. Fifty-seven comments were received on the proposed provision. Forty-sixcommenters opposed the provision on the basis that it would increase workloadand cost. The majority of the commenters stated that it is not feasibleto expect agencies to compare Federal, State and local health departmentstandards to determine which particular standard is more stringent forevery requirement associated with storage practices. Several commentersrecommended that the Department develop minimum standards in lieu of referringto Federal, State or local standards. It appears that these commenters have misinterpreted the Department's intentconcerning this requirement. This requirement does not mean that the agencycontracting for the storage must itself conduct inspections to insure compliancewith applicable Federal, State or local health standards. Nor did the Departmentintend that the distributing, subdistributing, recipient agency or theDepartment develop their own standards regarding proper storage. The Departmentbelieves that existing Federal, State and local regulations of the healthconditions of storage facilities should provide sufficient protection ofthe Department's donated foods. However, the Department wishes to ensurethat these storage facilities have actually received any inspection and/orapprovals required under existing laws and regulations. As a result, andSection;250.14(a) has been revised to emphasize that the responsibility of theagency contracting for the storage facility is to ensure that the storagefacility has obtained all required inspections and/or approvals and thatthey are current. This can be accomplished by reviewing documentation providedto the storage facility by the Federal, State and/or local health departmentsor by contacting the regulatory agencies for confirmation. Several commenters recommended that the requirement regarding the use ofpallets be deleted. Since the size of some storage areas does in fact preventthe use of pallets, andSection; 250.14(a) of this rule requires that donatedfoods be stored off the floor in a manner that provides for adequate ventilation.<T3>Reviews_</T3>Section 250.14(b) of the proposed rule required that distributingagencies ensure that an on-site review of the storage facilities be conductedprior to entering into or renewing a contract for the storage, handlingand distribution of foods. Forty comments were received concerning this requirement. Thirty-five ofthe commenters recommended that the requirement be revised or deleted becausecommenters felt there were insufficient staff and/or funds to conduct thereviews. Several of the commenters recommended that the review be conductedduring the contract period as part of the management evaluation reviewand that the Department clarify that subdistributing agencies and recipientagencies are responsible for reviews of their respective storage facilities.The Department believes that the review of storage facilities is essentialfor accountability. Distributing agencies can prevent claims by ensuringthat storage facilities adhere to program regulations. Furthermore, theDepartment believes that oversight review of storage facilities is important,because improper storage is the primary cause of food loss claims. Clearly,it is essential that commodities be stored in a safe environment. Consequently,andSection; 250.14(b) of this interim rule requires that all distributingagency level storage facilities be reviewed annually. In addition, distributingagencies must ensure that subdistributing and recipient agencies conductannual reviews of their respective storage facilities. Documentation thatwill reflect compliance as well as documentation of corrective action takenin cases of noncompliance must be maintained on file at the distributingagency or local level as appropriate.<T3>Contracts</T3>_Section 250.14(c) of the proposed rule required thatdistributing agencies, subdistributing agencies and recipient agenciesenter into annual written contracts for the leasing of storage facilities.Eighty-four comments were received on this proposal. Seventy commentersrecommended that the requirement be deleted or revised. Several of thecommenters expressed concern about the adverse effects such a requirementwould have. For example, commenters indicated that: (1) Substantial savingsare realized when contracts are entered into for longer periods of time;(2) in instances when contracts are entered into through the competitivebidding process, States would not only be required to go through this processevery year but the requirement could also necessitate annual transfersbetween storage facilities; (3) this would eliminate free storage and adverselyaffect temporary or short-term storage. The Department believes that a written contract is essential to clearlyestablish the liability between the two parties involved. Without sucha contract, establishing claims when losses occur can be problematic. Therefore,this interim rule provides for an annual contract. In recognition of thebenefits of a longer contract cycle, the interim rule has been modifiedto permit the one-year agreements to be extended at the option of bothparties, for two addtional one-year periods. As a part of each extension,the storage facility must update all pertinent information and demonstratethat all donated foods received during the previous contract period havebeen accounted for. The provision regarding two one-year extensions of contracts does not applyto existing contracts with storage facilities. It applies only to storagefacility contracts signed after the effective date of this rule. It isgenerally the policy of the Department not to apply a rule retroactively.In addition, the Department is limiting to distributing agencies and subdistributingagencies the requirements in andSection; 250.14(d) that storage facilitycontracts be in writing and be subject to a maximum three year biddingcycle. A corresponding change has been made to andSection; 250.12(d). Recipientagencies have been exempted from this requirement because of the heavypaperwork burden involved in such a requirement, particularly in lightof the typically small amount of commodities stored by recipient agencies.As pointed out by the commenters, these requirements could adversely affectthe ability of recipient agencies to find temporary or short-term storage.The Department also agrees with the commenters' concern that the contractrequirements might limit the availability of low-cost or free storage arrangementssometimes offered as a service to schools or other recipient agencies.For these reasons, the requirement for a written storage contract subjectto a three-year bidding cycle has been limited to distributing agency andsubdistributing agency storage contracts. However, there is nothing toprohibit the distributing agency from requiring recipient agencies to havea written contract. With respect to the assurances the contract must contain, the interim rulerequires (1) annual rather than semi-annual inventories as proposed (2)reconciliation of the annual physical inventory with the inventory records,and (3) termination of the contract for cause by either party upon 30 daysnotice, rather than for any reason and with 60 days notice as proposed.The changes involving the inventories are discussed in the next section.The Department believes that the changes in the time for notice prior tothe termination and the reasons therefore is necessary in light of thepotential three year periods which will be permitted between bidding forcontracts. <T3>Physical Inventory</T3>_Accountability and monitoring of donated foodsare two areas that have been under close scrutiny as a result of nationwideaudits conducted both by the Department's Office of Inspector General (OIG)and the General Accounting Office (GAO). OIG found that the system presentlyin use is inefficient for monitoring levels of donated foods. To ensure stricter inventory controls and accountability of donated foods,andSection; 250.14(d) of the proposed rule required distributing agencies,subdistributing agencies, and recipient agencies to conduct semi-annualphysical inventories of all storage facilities being used for the handling,storage and distribution of donated foods by June 30 and December 30 ofeach year. The physical inventory information was to be submitted to theappropriate FNSRO as part of the monthly inventory report for the monthsof June and December. Eighty-five comments were received regarding this proposed requirement.Seventy-five of the commenters expressed concern that the requirement wouldincrease costs and that there were insufficient staff to conduct such inventories.Commenters made the following recommendations: (1) Delete the semi-annualphysical inventory requirement; (2) conduct physical inventories annually;(3) limit inventories to facilities owned or used by distributing agenciesand recipient agencies; (4) limit inventories to distributing agency contractedfacilities; or (5) review inventories during management evaluation reviews.In recognition of the points raised by commenters while taking into considerationthe concerns of the Office of the Inspector General (OIG) and recommendationsof the General Accounting Office (GAO), andSection; 250.14(d) of this interimrule requires that during the annual review required by andSection; 250.14(b)a physical inventory be taken of the storage facility and reconciled withthe storage facility's inventory records and that the reconciliation bekept on file by the agency which contracted with or maintained the storagefacility. While a perpetual inventory is not specifically required by thisrule, in the Department's view a daily accounting of the usage of eachdonated food is an essential part of good management practice. A perpetualinventory record should show: (1) Dates of all transactions; (2) quantitieswithdrawn; and (3) balance of food in storage. The physical inventory willthen serve as a check on the accuracy of the inventory records. Any majordifferences in the two inventories, however, must be investigated thoroughly.Corrective action must be taken immediately and reported to the distributingagency. Since this rule requires that the physical inventory informationbe maintained on file, andSection; 250.17(b) which required submission ofthis information to the FNSRO, has been deleted in this interim rule. <T3>Excessive inventories</T3>_Section 250.14(e) of the proposed rule limitedthe inventory level of distributing agencies, subdistributing agenciesand recipient agencies to a six month supply, unless a justification fora higher level was approved. A total of eighty comments was received on this provision. Seventy-fourcommenters recommended that the provision be deleted or revised for thefollowing reasons: (1) Some products are offered only once a year; and(2) the Department's policy for shipping only truckload lots gives someStates a year's allotment at one time. However, several commenters endorsedthe requirement, as proposed. The provision limiting the inventory level to a six-month supply, unlessjustification for a higher level is approved, is retained in andSection;250.14(e) of this interim rule. Audits by OIG and GAO have disclosed majorproblems associated with excessive inventory levels. The reports indicatedthat excessive inventories resulted in increased storage costs, greaterpotential for infestation and spoilage and difficulty in effectively usingthe product. In addition, in instances when a food item may be offeredonly once, the limited supply of a food item is sufficient justificationfor either the distributing agency or FNSRO to approve a higher inventorylevel. Also, the Department is trying to eliminate inconsistencies in thecommodity program whenever possible. Retaining the six-month inventorylevel provision will make the Food Distribution Program consistent withthe current inventory limitations on processors participating under theNational Commodity Processing System and State processing contracts. Financial Management Section 813 of Pub. L. 100-77 extended the date for prohibiting the assessmentof fees for the intrastate cost of storage and transportation under Part251 of this chapter through September 30, 1988. Accordingly, this nondiscretionaryrequirement has been included in andSection; 250.15(a)(2) of this interimrule. Claims for Improper Distribution, Loss of, or Damage to Donated Foods andUse of Funds Accruing from Claims Section 250.6(m) of the current regulations requires the distributing agenciesto pursue claims arising in their favor immediately upon receipt of informationregarding commodity loss, damage, or improper distribution. Certain exemptionsfrom claims actions are provided for in instances of minimal inventoryshortages or losses. Section 250.6(k) of the current regulations containsprovisions concerning the use of funds accruing from claims, as well asthe use of funds accruing from other aspects of program operations. Atthe time the overall revisions to Part 250 were proposed, a determinationwas made that further consideration should be given to the procedures forpursuing claims and the use of funds accrued as a result of such claimsaction. Thus, andSection;andSection; 250.15(c) and (f)(1) were reserved inthe proposed rule. Because a proposed rule soliciting comments on theseprocedures has not been published, the provisions specified in andSection;250.6(m) and (k) of the current rule have been incorporated into this interimrule. Since these provisions are merely being incorporated from the currentregulations, no comments are being solicited at this time. The Departmentintends to publish a proposed rule addressing these provisions at a laterdate. Use of Program Funds <T3>Allowable Administrative Expenses</T3>_Section 250.15(f)(2) of theproposed rule listed some examples of unallowable expenses and also referencedthe Office of Management and Budget (OMB) Circular A-87, which outlinesin more detail the expenditures for which program funds cannot be used.Since this circular describes allowable expenses the Department did notbelieve it was necessary to repeat the entire listing in the proposed rule.A total of nine comments was received on this provision. The majority ofcommenters were in favor of the provision. Some commenters recommendedthat OMB Circular A-122 also be included since distributing agencies havecontracts with private nonprofit organizations. Although the proposed rule referenced OMB Circular A-87, the Departmentrecognizes that it is more appropriate to reference the portion of theDepartment's Uniform Federal Assistance regulations, 7 CFR Part 3015, SubpartT, which implements the OMB Circulars concerning Cost Principles, includingA-87 and A-122. Therefore, this interim rule references 7 CFR Part 3015,Subpart T rather than the circulars. This provision has also been redraftedto make clear that the list of unallowable costs is not exhaustive. <T3>Excess Funds</T3>_There are two ways which funds can accrue to distributingagencies as a result of program operations: (1) Through the collectionof distribution charges; and (2) through the sale of containers, salvageof donated foods, insurance collection or recoveries from loss or damageclaims. Currently the regulations specifically spell out the uses of thesetwo categories of funds. Distributing agencies are required to review atleast once each fiscal year the receipt and expenditure of funds to ensurethat fund balances are not in excess of program needs. If funds are foundto be excessive, the distributing agency is required to reduce such funds.If excess funds accumulate as a result of collection of distribution charges,such excess funds should be used to reduce such charges or be returnedto the contributor. If excess funds accrue from the sale of containers,salvage of donated foods, insurance or other recoveries from loss or damageclaims, such funds shall be used to reduce distribution charges, purchaseadditional foods or be paid to the Department. Section 250.15(f)(3) of the proposed regulations provided precise guidelinesfor determining what constitutes ``excess funds''. Since distributing agenciesuse these funds for different purposes, no specific dollar limit was proposed.The term ``excess funds'' was defined as funds exceeding the previous threemonth's expenditures. The total expenditures for the previous three monthsis the ``maximum'' amount of funds which the distributing agency may havein its account. Funds which exceed this amount were considered in excessof program needs unless the distributing agencies provided justificationof the need for such funds and the justification was approved by FNSRO.In some instances, the FNSRO may have considered funds equal to or lessthan the expenditures for the previous three months to be in excess ofwhat was needed. In such instances the distributing agency was requiredto reduce such funds. Expenditures of a nonrecurring nature were not includedin the determination of total expenditures for the previous three months.A total of forty-four comments was received on the proposed definition.Three commenters were in favor of the definition of excess funds, whileforty-one commenters were opposed. Generally, commenters contended thatbasing the definition on the previous three months' expenditures mightbe too restrictive. Commenters provided a wide range of timeframes on whichto base this definition. The main concern was that distributing agenciesmust have enough funds to conduct normal business during the months ofhigh expenditures and low revenues.In order to provide distributing agencies with more flexibility, andSection;250.15(f)(3) of the interim rule defines excess funds differently dependingon the source of the funds. As stated above, there are several ways distributingagencies can accrue funds; through the collection of distribution chargesand through the sale of containers, salvage of donated foods, insurancecollection or recoveries from loss or damage claims. Since the allowableuses of the funds depends on the source of the funds, in this interim ruledistributing agencies are required to maintain separate accounts for thetwo types of funds: an operating account based on distribution chargesand a salvage account based on the sale of containers, salvage and claims,etc. At a maximum, the operating account funds shall not exceed the sumof the previous year's highest three-month expenditures. Funds exceedingthis maximum shall be considered in excess of program needs unless thedistributing agency provides sufficient justification as to the need forsuch funds and receives approval from the FNSRO. The FNSRO may determinethat funds equal to or less than the expenditures for the previous year'shighest three months are in excess of what is needed. In such instances,the distributing agency shall also reduce such funds. As required in theproposed rule, if excess funds accumulate by reason of collection of distributioncharges, such funds shall be used to reduce such changes or shall be returnedto the contributor.The salvage account fund will normally have irregular deposits and irregularexpenses. Since nonrecurring unbudgeted expenditures will be made out ofthe salvage account, the interim rule sets no limit on this account. FNSROmust, however, give prior approval to each deposit or expenditure whichis in excess of $2,500. Since the interim rule does not set a limit onthe amount of funds which can accrue from the sale of containers, salvageof donated foods, insurance collection, or recoveries of claims for theloss or damage of donated foods, the portion of the proposed rule concerningthe use of excess funds of this type has been deleted. The use of the salvageaccount funds is governed by paragraph (f)(1) and (f)(2).Maintenance of recordsThe proposal in andSection; 250.16(a)(4) required processors or other entitieswhich contract with a distributing agency, subdistributing agency or recipientagency to keep records. While the Department considers food service managementcompanies and warehouses to fall in the category of ``other entities'',to avoid confusion the interim rule has been amended to specifically namethese two groups. <T3>Distributing agency-sponsored audits. </T3>Section 250.18(b) of theproposed rule required each distributing agency to provide for audits ofall food distribution program operations that include examination of recordspertaining to donated food acquisition, storage, distribution, processingactivities within the State (except for that of multi-State processors)and financial information.Fifty-three comments were received on this requirement. Fifty-one commentersopposed the provision. The majority of the commenters were concerned thatthe cost outweighed the benefits and that the audits served no useful purposesince they were mainly fiscal in nature. Most commenters recommended thatthe requirement be deleted.In response to the comments received, this interim rule eliminates thedistributing agency-sponsored audit provision. The Department has determinedthat strengthening the review requirements (andSection; 250.19(b)), whichfocus on program operations, is a much more effective means of ensuringappropriate oversight of program administration. Fiscal matters will continueto be reviewed in audits conducted under the Single Audit Act.ReviewsThe current regulations contain minimal monitoring provisions applicableonly to distributing agencies and State Agencies on Aging. Section 250.19of the proposed rule strengthened the monitoring provisions to ensure increasedaccountability.Section 250.19(b) of the proposal required to FNS to establish evaluationprocedures to determine whether distributing agencies have carried outthe provisions of this Part and FNS guidelines and instructions. Sincethis requirement involves internal departmental procedures, rather thanthe review requirements for distributing agencies, it has been removedfrom this interim rule. The Department will, however, be providing furtherassistance and guidance to distributing agencies to ensure that the proceduresestablished for reviews will encompass all operations covered by this Part.As a result of the deletion of this requirement, proposed andSection; 250.19(c)and (d) have been redesignated in the interim rule as andSection; 250.19(b)and (c), respectively.Section 250.19(c) of the proposed rule required annual reviews by the distributingagency of all distributing agency level storage facilities, all processors(other than multi-State processors), and most food service management companies;the proposed rule also required periodic reviews of recipient agenciesthat received donated food but were not subject to reviews under the otherFNS program regulations. Thus, the distributing agency would review charitableinstitutions, nonprofit summer camps for children, and nutrition programsfor the elderly. Because of variances within States, the proposed ruledid not establish minimum review frequencies for these recipient agenciesbut specifically requested that commenters make recommendations about thefrequency of reviews required for adequate coverage.Forty-five comment letters were received on the requirement for a formalState monitoring system, and all but three expressed opposition to oneor more provisions. The most frequent objection was that the added responsibilitiesfor distributing agencies would increase costs for activities for whichno Federal administrative funds are provided. Nevertheless, twenty-eightcommenters saw the need for some degree of periodic monitoring of recipientagencies. However, none recommended that more than 50 percent of the outletsin any category be reviewed each year. Of the seventeen comment lettersexpressing views on the frequency of onsite visits to recipient agencies,nine recommended that charitable institutions, nutrition programs for theelderly and summer camps all be placed on a 4-year review cycle for theFood Distribution Program similar to that required for the Assessment Improvementand Monitoring System (AIMS) under the regulations for the National SchoolLunch Program (7 CFR Part 210). Alternate recommendations were that reviewsof these recipient agencies be conducted every 2 years, 3 years or 5 years.Based on the commenters' recommendations and the Department's experiencewith reviews for other programs, andSection; 250.19(b) of the interim ruleestablishes a 4-year cycle for review of charitable institutions, nonprofitsummer camps and nutrition programs for the elderly with annual on-sitevisits required for not less than 25 percent each year. The 25 percentof the recipient agencies chosen to be reviewed each year must result inall recipient agencies being reviewed once every four years. The interimrule also clarifies the scope of these reviews. Sections 250.19(b)(1)(i)and (iv) require reviews to include on-site reviews of storage facilitiesused by these recipient agencies and a review of all contracts betweenthe recipient agency and food service management companies. Several commenters were concerned about the emission from the proposedrule of a monitoring requirement for Child Nutrition Program outlets. Thesecommenters pointed out that, while program regulations under Part 210,225, and 226 require periodic reviews of schools and institutions receivingcommodities, there is no requirement to review the commodity activitiesof those recipient agencies. Such a review should include an examinationof ordering, storage, use and accountability procedures. The commentersrecommended that these outlets be required to be reviewed periodicallyby distributing agencies. The Department recognizes this concern and upon re-evaluation may decideto require that these Child Nutrition Programs be reviewed. However, sincethe proposed rule omitted such requirements, the Department will addressthis matter in a proposed rule or other means to ensure that these outletsare monitored. The provision of andSection; 250.19(c)(1) of the proposed rule required anannual review of all food service management companies except those contractingwith schools. Because of commenters' concerns, the final rule requiresa biennial review. The interim rule retains the requirement for an annual review of all distributingagency level storage facilities as also reflected in andSection; 250.14(b).The interim rule also clarifies that these reviews must be conducted on-site.As required by andSection; 250.14(b), the distributing agency shall ensurethat local-level storage facilities are reviewed by appropriate recipientagency personnel. Section 250.19(b) also requires distributing agencies to conduct reviewof single State processors once every two years rather than annually asproposed. The Department determined that the frequency of once every twoyears will provide sufficient control based on reconsideration of the valueof commodities going to the processors. If, in the performance of its reviewfunctions the distributing agency discovers deficiencies or potential problems,corrective action should be taken to eliminate the deficiency immediately.<T3>Nondiscrimination</T3>_Section 250.21 of the proposed rule was reservedfor the program's nondiscrimination provisions. The Department determinedthat further consideration be given to developing expanded provisions onprohibitions against discrimination on the grounds of age, sex, or handicapas required by Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, section 504of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and the Age Discrimination Act of 1975.Upon reconsideration the Department has determined that there is no needto publish a separate Food Distribution Program rule covering these prohibitionssince there are Department-wide regulations (7 CFR Parts 15, 15a and 15b)already in place that are binding on all programs. Therefore, andSection;250.21 of this interim rule states the applicable prohibitions againstdiscrimination on the grounds of age, sex, handicap, race, color or nationalorigin and provides reference to the Department's regulations and instructionsconcerning civil rights. State Processing of Donated FoodsAs discussed above in the Supplementary Information section, the Departmentpublished in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>two regulations concerning State processing ofdonated food. Since comments have already been taken on these rules, theDepartment is not accepting any further comments pursuant to this rulemaking.These provisions are only included to provide a complete version of theFood Distribution Program regulations for reference purposes. Nonprofit Summer Camps for ChildrenSection 1562 of Pub. L. 99-198 amended section 4(b) of the Agricultureand Consumer Protection Act of 1973 to change the age limit of childrenfrom ``under 18'' to ``18 years of age and under''. Accordingly, this nondiscretionaryrequirement has been included in andSection; 250.40(a)(2) of the interimrule. This change in law is also reflected in a change in the definitionof adults from persons 18 years of age and over to persons 19 years ofage and over. Section 250.40(a)(1)(xi) of the proposed rule required that the agreementbetween the camp and distributing agency include an assurance that excesscommodity inventory be returned to the distributing agency. A total ofeight comments were received and all of the commenters opposed the provision.Commenters suggested that remaining inventories be redonated at the distributingagency to other recipient agencies at the end of the camping session. Commentersalso suggested that foods be transferred per instructions of the distributionagency. Section 250.40(a)(3) as proposed required distributing agencies to transferall donated foods remaining in summer camps at the end of the camping sessionto other recipient agencies. The Department notes, however, that some confusionmay have resulted from the use of the terms ``transfer'' and ``redonate.''Section 250.13 uses the term transfer when commodities are moved from onerecipient agency to another within a State and redonate when a distributingagency is unable to use the commodities and requests the FNSRO to movethem to another distributing agency. To be consistent with this usage,andSection; 250.40(a)(1)(xi) has been revised to require summer camps, atthe distributing agency's option, to transfer any remaining commoditiesin accordance with andSection; 250.13(a) or to return them to the distributingagency for redonation. A parallel change has been made to andSection; 250.40(a)(3),including cross references to the transfer and redonation provisions inandSection; 250.13.In addition, andSection; 250.40(a)(1)(x) has been changed to require assurancethat a reconciliation of the physical inventory will be conducted at theend of the camping session. This change is necessary to be consistent withthe annual reconciliation requirement of andSection; 250.14(d).Charitable InstitutionsUnder section 416 of the Agricultural Act of 1949, as amended, charitableinstitutions are eligible to receive commodities to the extent that theyserve needy persons. Section 250.41 of the proposed rule established a uniform means of determiningthe needy population of charitable institutions. In order to eliminatethe varying and often unreliable methods for determining the number ofneedy persons served by a charitable institution, the proposed regulationsrequired the distributing agency to determine the number of needy personsby: (1) Determining the percentage of subsidized income by dividing thesubsidized income by total subsidized and nonsubsidized income; and (2)multiplying that percentage by the average daily number of participants.For the purpose of this section ``subsidized income'' was defined as incomefrom public tax funds which is provided on behalf of participants thathave been determined to be in need of financial assistance through a means-testedprogram such as Medicaid or income received through private federally tax-exemptcontributions which provide for the care of participants the institutionhas determined to be in need of financial assistance. ``Nonsubsidized income''was defined as all other income, including payments made by institutionalparticipants for services received and payments made on behalf of participantsby persons legally responsible for their support. At a minimum, any timethe number of participants in an institution or the amount of income increasedor decreased by ten percent, the institution was required to notify thedistributing agency. The distributing agency was then to revise financialand participation data to reflect such changes. A total of thirty-two comments were received on the minimum requirementfor reporting changes in the population or income of an institution. Afew commenters recommended that hospital and nursing home caseloads bedetermined by Medicaid patient count as an alternative to the percent ofsubsidized income method. Twenty-eight commenters opposed the provisionon the basis that it was unrealistic, unmanageable, too time consumingand that it would increase cost, paperwork and workload.In response to commenters' concerns, the Department has decided to permitan alternative method to determine the needy population of charitable institutions.This alternative method allows institutions to count the number of peoplereceiving benefits under a means-tested program. For example, if an institutionhad 100 patients and 10 of those patients were receiving benefits undera means-tested program, i.e. Medicaid, then that number will be the basisfor determining the amount of donated foods that institution will receive.Thus, the interim rule requires distributing agencies to determine thenumber of needy persons being served in a charitable institution by usingthe subsidized income formula or by counting the number of needy personsreceiving benefits under another means-tested program.The Department is also eliminating the requirement for reporting ten percentchanges in the population or income. The income and average daily participationfigures reflected in the agreement shall be used in determining the numberof needy persons being served by the institution in accordance with theabove formulas. These figures will be based on the institution's financialand participation data for the previous year.Section 250.41 of the proposed rule also required that the agreement includeassurance that the tax exempt status be maintained. Upon reconsiderationthe Department has decided to delete this provision since verificationof tax exempt status is included in the updated information the distributingagency obtains from the charitable institution each year.In addition, the definition of ``charitable institution'' in Section 250.3of the proposed rule required that a charitable institution not only benonprofit, but also operate a nonprofit meal service. A total of thirty-fourcomments was received. Four commenters agreed with the provision whilethirty commenters objected for reasons such as the increased administrativeburden associated with the review of an organization's financial recordswhich would have to be done in order to determine if the meal service isnonprofit. Based on the commenters' concerns, the Department has re-evaluatedits position on this provision and has deleted the nonprofit meal servicelanguage from the definition and deleted the definition of ``nonprofitmeal service''.Some commenters recommended that Veteran Administration (VA) hospitalsand post-secondary schools be included in the definition of charitableinstitutions. Since donated foods are provided by the Commodity CreditCorporation directly to the VA hospitals, these hospitals are not includedin the definition. The Department has no legislative authority to providecommodities to post-secondary schools.<T3>Correctional Institutions</T3>_There is no specific legislative authorityfor USDA food donations to nonfederal, adult correctional institutions.However, the Department has determined that institutions which carry onprograms of rehabilitation for their inmates may be classified as ``charitableinstitutions'' within the intent of section 416 of the Agricultural Actof 1949, as amended. In order to distinguish between eligible correctionalinstitutions and ineligible penal institutions, Section 250.41(a)(2) ofthe proposed rule adopted the eligibility criteria for adult correctionalinstitutions to receive food donations as contained in FNS Instruction706-3. In order to receive donated foods, adult correctional facilitiesmust conduct rehabilitation programs which are (1) available to a majorityof inmates and (2) of sufficient scope to permit participation (for a minimumof 10 hours per week per inmate) by either a majority of the total inmatepopulation or a majority of sentenced inmates.A total of six comments was received on this requirement. Four commentersopposed the provision, suggesting that the ten hour per week rehabilitativeprogram be eliminated.As stated in the program rule, in the absence of express legislative authorityfor USDA food donations to nonfederal adult correctional institutions,the Department determined that such institutions which carry on programsof rehabilitation for their inmates may be classified as ``charitable institutions''.The Department believes that this is consistent with the requirements ofsection 416 of the Agriculture Act of 1949, as amended. Thus, andSection;250.41(a)(2) is retained as proposed.Nutrition Program for the ElderlyThe first sentence in andSection; 250.42(a) of the proposed rule stated thatdistributing agencies shall enter into an agreement with the State Agencyon Aging responsible for administering programs funded under Titles IIIor VI of the Older Americans Act of 1965 in accordance with andSection; 250.12(b)unless the State Agency on Aging has elected to receive all cash in lieuof donated foods. As commenters pointed out, the election of cash in lieudoes not prevent the State Agency on Aging from obtaining certain commoditiesin addition to the cash in lieu of the per meal rate of donated food. Therefore,this sentence has been deleted.In addition, andSection; 250.42 of the proposed regulations specified thatno adjustments in commodity allocations would be made on the basis of mealreports or estimates received after the close of the third Federal fiscalquarter of the year to which they pertain. Only two comments were receivedon this provision; one in favor and one opposed. The Department is retainingthe provision as proposed so as to avoid overallocation or underallocationof food.Finally, andSection; 250.42(b) has been amended to reflect the change tothe authorized level of assistance made by section 122(c) of Pub. L. 100-175(enacted on November 29, 1987).Emergency Food Assistance<T3>Disaster Assistance</T3>_Section 250.43 and 250.44 of the proposedrule clarified the responsibilities of the distributing agency and disasterorganizations in the use of donated foods during a major disaster, emergencyor other situations of distress.Section 250.43 of the proposed rule described the procedures for obtainingdonated foods in instances when the Secretary has determined that a majordisaster or emergency exists. The section also revised the procedures setforth in FNS Instruction 708-2 regarding household distribution of commoditieson Indian reservations in cases of a major disaster or emergency. Underthe instruction, Indian tribal organizations could receive donated foodsfor household distribution in any instance of major disaster or emergency,without meeting some of the requirements for disaster assistance in otherareas in which the Food Stamp Program is in operation. Under andSection;250.43(c) of the proposed rule, Indian tribal organizations would haveto meet the same criteria as those set forth for other jurisdictions wherethe Food Stamp Program is in operation before receiving donated foods forhousehold distribution.A total of nine comments were received. The commenters opposed variousprovisions in the section regarding the distribution of commodities duringdisaster and emergency situations. Commenters felt that it was time consumingto fill out applications especially in an emergency and it was not efficientfor States to wait for approval from the Secretary in order to meet specificneeds. Commenters also felt that in an emergency all displaced personsshould be considered in need regardless of income or social status.Section 250.43 has been revised in the interim rule to make clear thatit is the President who declares major disasters and emergencies pursuantto the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, but it is the Secretary who determinesthat, as a result of the major disaster or emergency, the type of assistancein the form of donated foods that is necessary. In addition, the interimrule provides that disaster assistance may continue as long as the Secretarydeems necessary, rather than only for the duration of the major disasteror emergency. This change parallels the language of section 409 of theDisaster Relief Act.Finally, the Department has decided to retain the limitation on the householddistribution of donated foods in areas where the Food Stamp Program isin operation. The proposed rule permitted the distribution of donated foodsto households in areas served by the Food Stamp Program only so long asthe Secretary finds that the commercial channels of trade have been disrupted.This limitation originated from a former provision of section 4(b) of theFood Stamp Act of 1977 (7 U.S.C. 2013(b)) which permitted the distributionof commodities to households in areas in which the Food Stamp Program wasin operation only on a temporary basis under programs authorized by lawto meet disaster relief need. This limitation, together with the provisionof section 5(h) of the Food Stamp Act of 1977 (7 U.S.C. 2014(h)), whichpermits the distribution of food stamps to disaster victims only afterthe normal channels or trade have been disrupted and then resumed, gaverise to the policy contained in the proposed rule.As noted earlier in the preamble, the general prohibition on householddistribution of donated food has been deleted from section 4(b) of theFood Stamp Act of 1977. However, the Department believes that it is duplicativeto permit the continuation of the household distribution of donated foodonce emergency food stamps become available. Therefore, the limitationon the distribution of commodities for household use to the period in whichnormal channels of trade are disrupted is being retained in andSection; 250.43(a)of this interim rule.With respect to the commenters' concern that delays would result from theneed to obtain approval by the Secretary prior to commencing householddistribution of commodities, the Department wishes to point out that andSection;250.43(c) required only the prior approval of the FNSRO. The Departmentbelieves that any delay would be insignificant and that the advance approvalis necessary to ensure accountability.Section 250.43(b)(2) of the interim rule has also been amended to clarifythe authority of the distributing agency to use donated foods from anysources within the State in a disaster. The Department believes that itis imperative that distributing agencies have the right to use donatedfoods so that they can coordinate and direct all intrastate donation offood during a disaster.<T3>Situations of Distress</T3>_Section 250.44 described the proceduresfor obtaining donated foods in situations of distress in which the needfor food assistance cannot be met under other provisions of Part 250. Donationsunder this section may only be made for special group food assistance.Section 250.44 of the proposed rule expanded the current regulations toclarify the responsibilities of the distributing agency in the use of donatedfoods during situations of distress. In addition, a limit was placed onthe distribution period to no longer than 30 days and required that thedonated foods is provided only to groups which are composed predominantlyof needy persons.Six comments were received on this provision. The majority of the commentersmisunderstood the provision believing that if referred to disasters. Onecommenter recommended that the current language be retained.The Department has reevaluated its position on this provision because insituations of distress, it is extremely difficult to determine who is needyand to determine how long the situation will last. In reviewing the proposedlanguage on situations of distress, the Department determined that it wasunclear what situations were ``distress situations'' and which would beconsidered ``disasters.'' Revisions (as previously noted) have been madeto the sections on disaster assistance to make those disaster provisionsmore explicit. In the case of situations of ``distress'', the Departmentfeels that the language in the current rule more clearly depicts the differencebetween a disaster and situations of distress. Finally, the proposed rulelimited the duration of food assistance in a distress situation to no morethan 30 days. The Department, however, believes that such a restrictionis unnecessary since the Secretary has the authority to determine the durationof the food assistance provided. Therefore, Section 250.44 is being revisedto contain the provisions appearing in Section 250.10 of the current rule.Food Distribution Program on Indian ReservationsThe Department proposed in andSection; 250.47(a) that distributing agencieswhich operate a food distribution program on an Indian reservation complywith andSection; 250.30 regarding State processing of donated food. Thissection was inadvertently included in the proposal. Compliance with andSection;250.30 has been removed from this interim rule since distributing agenciesfor Indian reservations receive only approved food packages for distributionto households. Paragraph (a) has also been revised to clarify that if thereis a conflict between the cited Part 250 section and Parts 253 and 254that the Parts 253 and 254 will take precedence.Paragraph (b) of this interim rule includes a reference to Part 254 FoodDistribution Program for Indian Households in Oklahoma. Reference to Part254 was inadvertently omitted in the proposal. However, since this partalso sets the conditions for Food Distribution Program administration byeligible Oklahoma tribes, reference to Part 254 is included in this interimrule.School Food AuthoritiesAll references to schools in andSection; 250.48 of the interim rule havebeen changed to school food authorities. This is being done to clarifythe rule because school food authorities, not schools, are the ones thatsign agreements with the distributing agency and which administer the programat the school level.Proposed paragraph (b)(1) <T3>Quantities </T3>required the distributing agency to develop a systemto update and review caseload information by June 30 and December 30. Theprovision has been changed to require that an estimate of the average dailynumber of meals be submitted as early as practicable each school year butnot later than September 1. This change merely incorporates the requirementas provided in 7 CFR 210.19(b).<T3>Offer and Acceptance System</T3>_Section 250.48(e)(2) of the proposedrule prohibited the refusal of donated foods in instances when an offer-and-acceptancesystem is being maintained. Use of the offer-and-acceptance system permitsschool food authorities to order only the amounts and varieties of donatedfoods they desire for the school lunch program on the basis of advancenotification by the distributing agency. Thus, the refusal provision isnot warranted in instances when an offer-and-acceptance system is beingmaintained.A total of fifteen comments was received on this provision. Nine commentersopposed the requirement and indicated that a refusal clause is needed tohelp discourage waste. Other commenters expressed concern that the requirementwould result in increased storage costs.The interim rule retains this provision as proposed. The Department believesthat if the offer-and-acceptance system is utilized correctly that schoolswill not need the 20 percent refusal provision.Nonresidential Childcare InstitutionsSection 250.49(b) of the proposed rule required the distributing agencyto develop a system to update and review caseload information by June 30and December 30 of each year. The provision has been revised in this interimrule to require that an estimate of the average daily number of meals besubmitted by the State agency to the distributing agency by June 1 of eachyear. This change is necessary to maintain consistency with the requirementfor reporting the average daily number of meals as contained in 7 CFR 226.6(g).Service InstitutionsSection 250.50(b) of the proposed rule required that service institutionssubmit the most recent written caseload information by April 30 of eachyear. This date has been changed in the interim rule to June 1 to incorporatethe requirement as provided in 7 CFR 225.5(b).Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants and Children (WIC)ProgramState agencies which administer the WIC program are eligible to receivedonated foods from the Department. Section 250.51 of the proposed ruleoutlined the procedures by which State agencies may request the donatedfoods for distribution to WIC Program participants. Those donated foodswhich are included in the WIC food package must be paid for by the Stateagencies with funds allocated to the State for the WIC Program. Donatedfoods which are provided to participants in addition to the quantitiesauthorized for the food package are made available to the State agencyfree of charge. Since no comments were received on this provision, andSection;250.51 is retained in this interim rule as proposed.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 7 CFR Part 250</ITAG>Aged, Agricultured commodities, Business and industry, Food assistanceprograms, Food donations, Food processing, Grant programs_social programs,Infants and children price support programs, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, School breakfast and lunch programs, Surplus agriculturalcommodities.7 CFR Chapter II is amended by revising Part 250 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER B_GENERAL REGULATIONS AND POLICIES_FOOD DISTRIBUTION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 250_DONATION OF FOODS FOR USE IN THE UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIESAND POSSESSIONS AND AREAS UNDER ITS JURISDICTION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.1 General purpose and scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.2 Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_General Operating Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.10 Eligible distributing and subdistributing agencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.11 Eligibility determination for recipient agencies and recipients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.12 Agreements and contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.13 Distribution and control of donated foods.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.14 Storage facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.15 Financial management.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.16 Maintenance of records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.17 Reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.18 Audits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.19 Reviews.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.20 Sanctions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.21 Civil rights.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.22 Complaints.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Processing and Labeling of Donated Foods</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.30 State processing of donated foods.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Eligible Recipients Agencies and Programs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.40 Nonprofit summer camps for children.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.41 Charitable institutions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.42 Nutrition programs for the elderly.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.43 Disaster organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.44 Special food assistance programs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.45 Commodity Supplemental Food Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.46 Food Distribution Program in the Trust Territory of the PacificIslands.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.47 Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.48 School food authorities and commodity schools.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.49 Nonresidential child care institutions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.50 Service institutions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.51 Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Where to obtain Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.60 Program information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority</T4>: Sec. 32, Pub. L. 74-320, 49 Stat. 744 (7 U.S.C. 612c);Pub. L. 75-165, 50 Stat. 323 (15 U.S.C. 713c); secs. 6, 9, Pub. L. 79-396,60 Stat. 231, 233 (42 U.S.C. 1755, 1758); Sec. 416, Pub. L. 81-439, 63Stat. 1058 (7 U.S.C. 1431); Sec. 402, Pub. L. 81-665, 68 Stat. 843 (22U.S.C. 1922); Sec. 210, Pub. L. 84-540, 70 Stat. 202 (7 U.S.C. 1859); Sec.9, Pub. L. 85-931, 72 Stat. 1792 (7 U.S.C. 1431b); Pub. L. 86-756, 74 Stat.899 (7 U.S.C. 1431 note); Sec. 709, Pub. L. 89-321, 79 Stat. 1212 (7 U.S.C.1446a-1); Sec. 3, Pub. L. 90-302, 82 Stat. 117 (42 U.S.C. 1761); Secs.409, 410, Pub. L. 93-288, 88 Stat. 157 (42 U.S.C. 5179, 5180); Sec. 2,Pub. L. 93-326, 88 Stat. 286 (42 U.S.C. 1762a); Sec. 16, Pub. L. 94-105,89 Stat. 522 (42 U.S.C. 1766); Sec. 1304(a) Pub. L. 95-113, 91 Stat. 980(7 U.S.C. 612c note); Sec. 311, Pub. L. 95-478, 92 Stat. 1533 (42 U.S.C.3030a); Sec. 10, Pub. L. 95-627, 92 Stat. 3623 (42 U.S.C. 1760); Sec. 1114(a),Pub. L. 97-98, 95 Stat. 1269 (7 U.S.C. 1431e); Title II, Pub. L. 98-8,97 Stat. 35 (7 U.S.C. 612c note); (5 U.S.C. 301), unless otherwise noted.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General purpose and scope.</ITAG>This part prescribes the terms and conditions under which donated foodsmay be obtained from the Department by Federal, State and private agenciesfor use in any State in child nutrition programs, nonprofit summer campsfor children, charitable institutions, nutrition programs for the elderly,the Commodity Supplemental Food Program, the Special Supplemental FoodProgram for Women, Infants, and Children, the Food Distribution Programson Indian Reservations and the assistance of needy persons.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administration. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Delegation to FNS.</T3> Within the Department, FNS shall act on behalfof the Department in the administration of the program. FNS will provideassistance to distributing agencies and evaluate all levels of programoperations to assure that the goals of the program are achieved in themost effective and efficient manner possible. (b) <T3>Delegation to distributing agency.</T3> The distributing agency isresponsible for effective and efficient administration of program operationswithin its jurisdiction and shall administer the program in accordancewith the requirements of this Part and FNS guidelines and instructions.Distributing agencies may impose additional requirements for participationthat are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Part, except thatthis provision shall not apply to distribution to households on all orpart of an Indian reservation which is participating in the Food DistributionProgram under Part 253 and Part 254 of this chapter. The distributing agencyshall provide guidance to subdistributing agencies and recipient agencieson all aspects of program operations. (c) <T3>Personnel.</T3> Each distributing agency shall provide adequate personnel,to administer the program in accordance with this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>``Charitable institutions'' means: (a) A nonpenal, noneducational public (Federal, State or local) institution,(b) A nonprofit, tax exempt, private hospital, or (c) Any other nonprofit, noneducational, tax exempt private institutionorganized to provide charitable or public welfare services in the sameplace without marked changes and, at the Department's option, approvedby a public welfare agency as meeting a definite need in the communityby administering to needy persons, and provides a meal service on a regularbasis. Charitable institutions include any institution defined as ``serviceinstitution''; ``nonresidential child care institution''; or ``school''which is not a commodity school or does not participate in a child nutritionprogram. For purposes of this paragraph, tax exempt shall mean exempt fromincome tax under the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and a charitableinstitution shall be considered ``noneducational'' even though educationalcourses are given, where such courses are incidental to the primary purposeof the charitable institution. ``Child nutrition program'' means the National School Lunch Program, theSchool Breakfast Program, the Summer Food Service Program for Children,or the Child Care Food Program (Parts 210, 220, 225, and 226 respectivelyof this chapter). ``Commodities'' means foods donated, or available for donation, by theDepartment under any of the legislation referred to in this part (see ``DonatedFoods''). ``Commodity school'' means a school that does not participate in the NationalSchool Lunch Program under Part 210 of this chapter but which operatesa nonprofit school food service under agreement with the State educationalagency or FNSRO as provided for under Part 210 of this Chapter and receivesdonated foods, or donated foods and cash or services of a value of up to5 cents per lunch in lieu of donated foods under Part 240 of this Chapterfor processing and handling of the donated foods. ``Contract value of the donated foods'' means the price assigned by theDepartment to a donated food which shall reflect the Department's currentacquisition price, transportation and, if applicable, processing costsrelated to the food. ``Contracting agency'' means the distributing agency, subdistributing agency,or recipient agency which enters into a processing contract. ``Department'' means the United States Department of Agriculture or theCommodity Credit Corporation, whichever is the donor under the pertinentlegislation. ``Disaster organizations'' means organizations authorized by appropriateFederal or State officials to assist disaster victims. ``Disaster victims'' means persons who, because of acts of God or manmadedisasters, are in need of food assistance, whether or not they are victimsof a major disaster or an emergency as defined in this section. ``Discount system'' means a system whereby a recipient agency purchasesend products directly from a processor at an established wholesale priceminus the contract value of the donated foods contained in the end products.``Distributing agency'' means a State, Federal or private agency, or IndianTribal Organization (ITO) which enters into an agreement with the Departmentfor the distribution of donated foods to eligible recipient agencies andrecipients and the Food and Nutrition Services of the Department when itaccepts title to commodities from the Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC)for distribution to eligible recipient agencies pursuant to the NationalCommodity Processing System. A distributing agency may also be a recipientagency. ``Distributor'' means a commercial food purveyor or handler who is independentof a processor and both sells and bills for the end products deliveredto recipient agencies. ``Donated foods'' means foods donated, or available for donation, by theDepartment under any of the legislation referred to in this part (see ``Commodities'').``Emergency'' means any hurricane, tornado, storm, flood, high water, wind-drivenwater, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide,snowstorm, drought, fire, explosion, or other catastrophe in any part ofthe United States which requires Federal emergency assistance to supplementState and local efforts to save lives and protect property, health, andsafety or to avert or lessen the threat of a disaster. ``End product'' means a product containing any amount of donated foodswhich have been processed. ``Federal acceptance service'' means the acceptance service provided by:(a) The applicable grading branches of the Department's Agricultural MarketingService (AMS), (b) The Department's Federal Grain Inspection Service, and (c) The National Marine Fisheries Service of the U.S. Department of Commerce.``Fiscal year'' means the period of 12 months beginning October 1 of anycalendar year and ending September 30 of the following year. ``FNS'' means the Food and Nutrition Service of the Department of Agriculture.``FNSRO'' means the appropriate Food and Nutrition Service Regional Officeof the Food and Nutrition Service of the Department of Agriculture. ``Food service management company'' means a commercial enterprise or anonprofit organization which is or may be contracted with by a recipientagency to manage any aspect of its food service in accordance with andSection;250.12(c) of this part or in accordance with Parts 210, 220, 225, or 226of this chapter. ``Household'' means a group of related or non-related individuals, exclusiveof boarders, who are not residents of an institution, but who are livingas one economic unit and for whom food is customarily purchased and preparedin common. It also means a single individual living alone. ``In-kind replacement'' means replacement of lost donated foods with aquantity of the same foods of U.S. origin that are of equal or better qualitythan the lost foods and that are of at least equal monetary value to theDepartment's cost of replacing the lost foods. ``Major disaster'' means any hurricane, tornado, storm, flood, high water,wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption,landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, fire, explosion, or other catastrophein any part of the United States which, in the determination of the President,causes damage of sufficient severity and magnitude to warrant major disasterassistance under the Disaster Relief Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5121), aboveand beyond emergency services by the Federal Government, to supplementthe efforts and available resources of States, local governments, and disasterrelief organizations in alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or sufferingcaused thereby. (This definition is taken from the Disaster Relief Actof 1974.) ``Multi-State processor'' means: (a) A processor which has entered into a processing contract with contractingagencies in more than one State, or (b) A processor which has entered into a processing contract with one ormore contracting agencies located in a State other than the one in whicheither the processor's plant or business office is located. ``Needy persons'' means: (a) Persons provided service by charitable institutions, who, because oftheir economic status, are in need of food assistance, (b) All the members of a household who are certified as in need of foodassistance, and (c) Disaster victims. ``Nonprofit school food service'' means all food service operations conductedby the school food authority principally for the benefit of school children,all of the revenue from which is used solely for the operation or improvementof such food services. ``Nonprofit summer camps for children'' means nonprofit camps which donot participate in the Summer Food Service Program for Children authorizedunder section 13 of the National School Lunch Act, as amended (42 U.S.C.1761), and in which, during the months of May through September, meal servicesare conducted for children of high school grade and under. ``Nonresidential child care institution'' means any institution (as definedin Part 226 of this chapter) which participates in the Child Care FoodProgram authorized under section 17 of the National School Lunch Act, asamended (42 U.S.C. 1766).``Nutrition program for the elderly'' means a project conducted by a recipientof a grant or contract under Title III or Title VI of the Older AmericansAct of 1965, as amended (42 U.S.C. 3030a).``Offer-and-acceptance system'' means a procedure whereby a school foodauthority is given the opportunity to order only the amounts and varietiesof donated foods it desires for its school lunch program on the basis ofadvance notification by the distributing agency.``Performance supply and surety bond'' means a written instrument issuedby a surety company which guarantees performance and supply of end productsby a processor under the terms of a processing contract.``Processing'' means:(a) The conversion of a donated food or donated foods into a differentend product or (b) The repackaging of a donated food or donated foods.``Processing fee'' means the amount charged to a contracting agency fora processor's services.``Processor'' means a commercial facility, other than a food service managementcompany, which processes donated foods.``Program'' means the Food Distribution Program.``Recipient agencies'' means nonprofit summer camps for children, charitableinstitutions, nutrition programs for the elderly, disaster organizations,school food authorities, schools, nonresidential child care institutions,service institutions, and welfare agencies receiving foods for their ownuse or for distribution to eligible recipients.``Recipients'' means the needy persons receiving commodities for householdconsumption.``Refund application'' means an application by a recipient agency in anyform acceptable to the processor which certifies purchase of end productsand requests a refund of the contract value of the donated foods containedin the end products purchased.``Refund system'' means a system whereby a recipient agency purchases aprocessor's end products and receives from the processor a payment equivalentto the contract value of the donated foods contained in the end products.``School'' means: (a) An educational unit of high school grade or under, recognized as partof the educational system in the State and operating under public or nonprofitprivate ownership in a single building or complex of buildings. The term``high school grade or under'' includes classes of preprimary grade whenrecognized as part of the education system of the States; (b) Any public or nonprofit private classes of preprimary grade when theyare conducted in those schools defined in paragraph (a) of this definitionhaving classes of primary or of higher grade; (c) Any public or nonprofit private residential child care institution,or distinct part of such institution, which operates principally for thecare of children, and if private, is licensed to provide residential childcare services under the appropriate licensing code by the State or a subordinatelevel of government, <T3>except for </T3>residential summer camps which participate in the SummerFood Service Program for Children, Job Corps centers funded by the Departmentof Labor and private foster homes. The term ``residential child care institutions''includes, but is not limited to: homes for the mentally, emotionally orphysically impaired, and unmarried mothers and their infants; group homes;halfway houses; orphanages; temporary shelters for abused children andfor runaway children; long-term care facilities for chronically ill children;and juvenile detention centers. A long-term care facility is a hospital,skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, or distinct partthereof, which is intended for the care of children confined for 30 daysor more; or (d) With respect to the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, nonprofit child carecenters certified as such by the Governor of Puerto Rico.``School food authority'' means the governing body which is responsiblefor the administration of one or more schools and which has the legal authorityto operate a nonprofit school food service therein or otherwise approvedby FNS to operate the NSLP.``School year'' means the period of 12 months beginning July 1 of any calendaryear and ending June 30 of the following calendar year.``Secretary'' means the Secretary of Agriculture.``Section 4(a)'' means section 4(a) of the Agriculture and Consumer ProtectionAct of 1973, as amended (7 U.S.C. 612c note). Section 4(a) authorizes thepurchase of foods for distribution to maintain the traditional level ofassistance for food assistance programs as are authorized by law, includinginstitutions, supplemental feeding programs, disaster areas, summer campsfor children, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, and Indians whenevera tribal organization requests distribution of federally-donated foodsunder section 4(b) of the Food Stamp Act of 1977 (7 U.S.C. 2013(b)).``Section 6'' means section 6 of the National School Lunch Act, as amended(42 U.S.C. 1755). Section 6 authorizes the purchase of foods for distributionto schools and institutions participating in child nutrition programs underthe National School Lunch Act and specifies the level of assistance whichis to be provided.``Section 14'' means section 14 of the National School Lunch Act, as amended(42 U.S.C. 1762a). Section 14 authorizes the purchase of foods for distributionto maintain the annually programmed level of assistance for programs carriedon under the National School Lunch Act, the Child Nutrition Act of 1966,and Title III of the Older Americans Act of 1965.``Section 32'' means section 32 of Public Law 74-320, as amended (7 U.S.C.612c). Section 32 authorizes the Department to purchase nonbasic perishablefoods available under surplus-removal operations, for the purpose of encouragingthe domestic consumption of such foods by diverting them from the normalchannels of trade or commerce.``Section 311'' means section 311 of the Older Americans Act of 1965, asamended (42 U.S.C. 3030a). Section 311 authorizes the purchase of commoditiesfor nutrition programs for the elderly.``Section 416'' means section 416 of the Agricultural Act of 1949, as amended(7 U.S.C. 1431). Section 416 authorizes the Department to donate basicnonperishable foods acquired through Federal price-support operations foruse by needy persons, for use in nonprofit school lunch programs and nonprofitsummer camps for children, and for use in charitable institutions to theextent that needy persons are served.``Section 709'' means section 709 of the Food and Agricultural Act of 1965,as amended (7 U.S.C. 1446a-1). Section 709 authorizes the purchase of adequatesupplies of dairy products to meet the requirements of schools, domesticrelief distribution, and other programs authorized by law when the stocksof the Commodity Credit Corporation are insufficient to meet those requirements.``Service institutions'' means camps or sponsors (as those terms are definedin Part 225 of this Chapter) which participate in the Summer Food Serviceprogram authorized under section 13 of the National School Lunch Act, asamended (42 U.S.C. 1761).``Similar replacement'' means replacement of lost donated foods with aquantity of similiar foods of U.S. origin of the same types as those normallydonated by the Department and of at least equal monetary value to the Department'scost of replacing the lost foods. Such replacement shall be subject tothe approval of the FNSRO.``State'' and ``United States'' means any one of the 50 States, the Districtof Columbia, Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, andthe Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands.``State Agency on Aging'' means:(a) the State agency that has been designated by the Governor and approvedby the United States Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) toadminister nutrition programs for the elderly under Title III of the OlderAmericans Act of 1965, as amended or (b) The Indian tribal organization which has been approved by DHHS to administernutrition programs for the elderly under Title VI of such act.``Students in home economics'' means students in regular classes whereinthey are taught general home economics including food preparation, cooking,serving, nutrition, food purchasing, child care and health.``Subdistributing agency'' means an agency performing one or more distributionfunctions for a distributing agency other than, or in addition to, functionsnormally performed by common carriers or warehousemen. A subdistributingagency may also be a recipient agency.``Substituted food'' means domestically produced food that is purchasedor manufactured by a processor and is substituted for donated food.``Substitution'' means:(a) The replacement of donated foods with like quantities of domesticallyproduced commercial foods of the same generic identity and of equal orbetter quality (i.e. cheddar cheese for cheddar cheese, nonfat dry milkfor nonfat dry milk, etc.); or(b) In the case of donated nonfat dry milk, substitution as defined under(a) of this definition or replacement with an equivalent amount, basedon milk solids content, of domestically produced concentrated skim milk.``Welfare agency'' means a public (Federal, State or local) or privateagency offering assistance on a charitable or welfare basis to needy persons,who are not residents of an institution, and to Tribal councils designatedby the Bureau of Indian Affairs.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_General Operating Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible distributing and subdistributing agencies.</ITAG>(a) <T3>State and Federal agencies.</T3> Federal agencies and such State agenciesas are designated by the Governor of the State, or by the State legislature,and approved by the Secretary are eligible to become distributing agencies.(b) <T3>Private agencies.</T3> Where distributing agencies are not permittedby law to make distribution to private recipient agencies, or to any classof private recipient agency, private agencies which agree to make distributionof donated food on a State-wide basis and which apply directly to FNS,and are approved by the Secretary are eligible to become distributing agencies.(c) <T3>Subdistributing agencies.</T3> If distributing agencies use subdistributingagencies to distribute donated foods, the distributing agencies' responsibilitiesto the Department for overall management and control of the distributionprogram shall not be delegated to such subdistributing agencies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligibility determination for recipient agencies and recipients.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Verification of recipient agency eligibility. </T3>Distributing agenciesat the request of FNS shall:(1) Verify that recipient agencies registered to participate in the NationalCommodity Processing (NCP) Program have a current agreement with the distributingagency to receive donated food in accordance with andSection; 252.1(c) and(2) Report the results of such verification to FNS within timeframes determinedby FNS.(b) <T3>Eligibility of recipient agencies and recipients.</T3> Distributingagencies shall determine the eligibility of any agency which submits anapplication for participation in the program. Distributing agencies shallconsider the past performance of recipient agencies when approving applicationsfor participation. Once a recipient agency has been determined to be eligiblefor participation in the program, the distributing agency shall enter intoan agreement with the agency in accordance with andSection; 250.12(b) andmake donated food available. Distributing agencies shall impose upon welfareagencies the responsibility for determining that recipients to whom welfareagencies distribute donated foods are eligible: <T3>Provided, however:</T3> That the State agency or FNSRO administeringthe applicable program shall determine the eligibility under this Partof school food authorities participating under Part 210 or Part 220, orsponsors participating in the Summer Food Service Program for Childrenunder Part 225, of this chapter, and of nonresidential child care institutionsparticipating in the Child Care Food Program under Part 226 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Agreements and contracts.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Agreements with Department. </T3>Prior to the beginning of a distributionprogram, distributing agencies shall enter into written agreements withthe Department which shall incorporate the terms and conditions set forthin this Part. When requested by the Department an eligible agency shallpresent evidence of its authority to enter into such agreements. The agreementsshall be effective for no longer than one year and must be completed bySeptember 30 of each year. In addition, agreements between the Departmentand State Agencies on Aging which elect to receive cash in lieu of commoditiesshall also be effective for no longer than one year and must be completedby September 30 of each year.(b) <T3>Distributing agency agreements. </T3>Distributing agencies shall enterinto written agreements with all subdistributing agencies, recipient agencies,warehouses, carriers, or other entities to which distributing agenciesdeliver donated foods under their distribution program. Distributing agenciesshall be responsible for ensuring that program integrity is maintainedby all entities with whom agreements are entered into. All agreements shallcontain such terms and conditions as the distributing agency deems necessaryto ensure that:(1) The distribution and use of donated foods is in accordance with thisPart,(2) Subdistributing agencies, recipient agencies, warehouses, carriers,or other persons to whom donated foods are delivered by the distributingagency are responsible to the distributing agency for any improper distributionor use of donated foods or for any loss of, or damage to, donated foodscaused by their fault or negligence,(3) Subdistributing agencies and recipient agencies have and preserve aright to assert claims against other persons to whom donated foods aredelivered for care, handling or distribution, and(4) Subdistributing agencies and recipient agencies will take action toobtain restitution in connection with claims for improper distribution,use or loss of, or damage to, donated foods.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">To the extent that bills of lading and warehouse receipts satisfythe above-stated criteria, the distributing agency may consider such documentsas appropriate agreements. The agreement shall be in effect for not longerthan one year and shall provide that it may be extended at the option ofboth parties for two additional one year periods. Agreements may be terminatedfor cause by either party upon 30 days notice. At the time the agreementis extended, the party contracting with the distributing agency must updateall pertinent information and must demonstrate that all donated food receivedduring the prior contract period has been accounted for.(c) <T3>Food service management company agreements. </T3>Food service managementcompanies may be employed to conduct the food service operations of nonprofitsummer camps for children, charitable institutions, nutrition programsfor the elderly, schools, nonresidential child care institutions, and serviceinstitutions. In instances when a food service management company is employedto provide such services, the recipient agency shall enter into a writtencontract with the food service management company which shall expresslyprovide that:(1) Any donated foods received by the recipient agency and made availableto the food service management company shall be utilized solely for thepurpose of providing benefits for the employing agency's food service operationand it is the responsibility of the recipient agency to demonstrate thatthe full value of all donated foods is used solely for the benefit of therecipient agency; and(2) The books and records of the food service management company pertainingto the food service operation of the agency shall be available for a periodof three years from the close of the fiscal year to which they pertain.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">All food service management contracts shall be subject to review bythe distributing agency for compliance with requirements of this sectionin accordance with andSection; 250.19(b)(1). In the case of nonprofit summercamps for children, charitable institutions and nutrition programs forthe elderly, the contract shall be in effect for no longer than one yearand shall provide that it may be extended at the option of both partiesfor two additional one-year periods. Contracts may be terminated for causeby either party upon 30 days notice. At the time the contract is extended,the nonprofit summer camp for children, charitable institution or nutritionprogram for the elderly must update all pertinent information and mustdemonstrate that all donated food received during the previous contractperiod has been accounted for.(d) <T3>Storage facility contracts.</T3> When contracting for storage facilities,distributing agencies and subdistributing agencies shall enter into a writtencontract for the lease of storage facilities in accordance with andSection;250.14(c).(e)<T3> Processing contracts.</T3> When contracting for the processing ofdonated foods, contracting agencies shall enter into agreements with processorsin accordance with andSection; 250.30(c).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Distribution and control of donated foods.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Availability and use of donated foods.</T3> (1) <T3>Availability and use. </T3>Donated foods shall be available only fordistribution and use in accordance with the provisions of this Part and,with respect to distribution to households on all or part of an Indianreservation, of Part 253 and 254 of this chapter. Donated foods not sodistributed or used (for any reason) shall not be sold, exchanged or otherwisedisposed of without the approval of the Department. Donated foods whichare provided as part of an approved food package or authorized programlevel of assistance may be transferred between like recipient agencieswith only prior authorization of the distributing agency. Donated foodswhich are provided in addition to the State's authorized program levelof assistance may be transferred between recipient agencies which are eligibleto receive such foods with the prior authorization of the distributingagency. However, the transfer of donated foods between unlike recipientagencies (schools to charitable institutions), which have been providedas part of an approved food package or authorized program level of assistance,must be approved by the appropriate FNSRO. Food donation under section32 of Pub. L. 74-320 (7 U.S.C. 612c) may also be transferred by recipientagencies to emergency feeding organizations which are distributing donatedfoods under 7 CFR Part 251. A transfer between recipient agencies and emergencyfeeding organizations may be made only with the prior approval of the distributingagency and the State agency responsible for administering TEFAP. All transfersof donated foods shall be documented. Such documentation shall be maintainedin accordance with the recordkeeping requirements in andSection;andSection;250.16 and 251.10(a).(2)<T3> Allocations.</T3> As foods become available for donation, FNS shallnotify distributing agencies regarding the donated foods, the class orclasses of recipient agencies or recipients eligible to receive them, andany special terms and conditions of donation and distribution which attachto a particular donated food in addition to the general terms and conditionsset forth herein. Every attempt shall be made to deliver the donated foodsin accordance with requested schedules. However, the Department shall notbe responsible for delay in delivery or for nondelivery of donated foodsdue to any cause.(3) <T3>Minimum donations.</T3> Foods shall be donated only in such quantitiesas will protect the lower carload freight rate, except as deemed in thebest interest of the program as determined by the Department.(4)<T3> Quantities.</T3>(i) The quantity of donated foods to be made available for donation underthis Part shall be determined in accordance with the pertinent legislationand the program obligations of the Department, and shall be such as canbe effectively distributed to further the objectives of the pertinent legislation.(ii) Donated foods shall be requested and distributed only in quantitieswhich can be consumed without waste in providing food assistance for personseligible under this part. Distributing agencies shall impose similar restrictionson recipient agencies.(5) <T3>Demonstrations and tests.</T3> Notwithstanding any other provisionof this Part, a quantity of any food donated for use by any recipient agencyor recipient may be transferred by the distributing agency or by the recipientagency to bona fide experimental or testing agencies, or for use in workshops,or for demonostrations or tests relating to the utilization of such donatedfood by the recipient agency or recipient. No such transfer by any recipientagency shall be made without the approval of the appropriate distributingagency.(b) <T3>Processing and other costs.</T3> The Department shall pay such processing,reprocessing, transporting, handling and other charges accruing up to thetime of transfer of title to distributing agencies as is deemed in thebest interest of the Department.(c) <T3>Transfer of title.</T3> Title to donated foods shall pass to distributingagencies upon their acceptance of donated foods at time and place of delivery,limited, however, by the obligation of the distributing agency to use suchdonated foods for the purposes and upon the terms and conditions set forthin this part.(d)<T3> Distribution of donated foods to recipient agencies or recipients_</T3>(1)<T3> Distribution.</T3> Donated foods shall be distribute only to recipientagencies an recipients eligible to receive them under this part (see SubpartD). Distributing agencies shall require that welfare agencies and disasterorganizations distributed donated foods only to recipients eligible toreceive them under this part. It shall not be deemed a failure to complywith the provisions of this part if recipient agencies serve meals containingdonated foods to persons other than those who are eligible under this part,when such persons share common preparation, serving or dining facilitieswith eligible persons (needy persons, children, participants in nutritionprograms for the elderly) and at least one of the following is true:(i) Such other persons are common beneficiaries with the eligible personsof the program of the recipient agency, or(ii) Such other persons are few in number compared to the eligible personsand receive their meals as an incident of their service to the eligiblepersons.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Such other persons include, but are not limited to teachers, disasterrelief workers, and staff members. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construedas authorizing allocation or issuance of donated foods to recipient agenciesin greater quantity than that authorized for the assistance of personseligible under this part.(2) <T3>Normal food expenditures. </T3>Section 416 donated foods shall notbe distributed to any recipient agencies or recipients whose normal foodexpenditures are reduced because of the receipt of donated foods.(e) <T3>Improper distribution, loss of or damage to donated foods. </T3>(1)If a distributing agency improperly distributes or uses any donated foodsor causes loss of or damage to a donated food through its failure to provideproper storage, care or handling, the provisions set forth in andSection;250.15(c) shall apply.(2) In instances when it is determined by a distributing agency that aclaim exists against a subdistributing agency, recipient agency, warehouse,carrier, processor or other person, the distributing agency shall pursueclaims in accordance with andSection; 250.15(c).(f) <T3>Disposition of damaged or out-of-condition foods. </T3>Donated foodswhich are found to be damaged or out-of-condition and are declared unfitfor human consumption by Federal, State or local health officials, or byother inspection services or persons deemed competent by the Department,shall be disposed of in accordance with instructions of the Department.Such instructions may direct that unfit donated food be:(1) Sold in a manner prescribed by the Department with the net proceedsthereof remitted to the Department;(2) Sold in a manner prescribed by the Department with the proceeds thereofretained for use in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 250.15(f);(3) Used in such manner as will serve a useful purpose as determined bythe Department; or(4) Destroyed in accordance with applicable sanitation laws and regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Upon a finding by the Department that donated food are unfit for humanconsumption at the time of delivery to the distributing agency and whenthe Department or appropriate health officials require that such donatedfoods be destroyed, the Department may pay to the distributing agency anyexpenses incurred in connection with such donated foods as determined bythe Department. The Department may, in any event, repossess damaged orout-of-condition donated foods.(g) <T3>Redonations. </T3>Whenever a distributing agency has any donated foodon hand which it cannot efficiently utilize, it shall immediately makea request to the appropriate FNSRO, in writing, for instructions as tothe disposition of such donated food. Distributing agencies requestingauthority from the Department to make redonation of any donated foods shall,upon the Department's request, have such donated foods federally inspected.Expenditures incurred by the distributing agency as a result of redonationshall be handled in accordance with andSection; 250.15(e).(h) <T3>Embezzlement, misuse, theft, or obtainment by fraud of donated foodsand donated food-related funds, assets, or property. </T3>Notwithstandingparagraph (c) of this section concerning transfer of title to donated foods,whoever embezzles, willfully misapplies, steals, or obtains by fraud, donatedfoods or any funds, assets, or property deriving from donated foods orwhoever receives, conceals, or retains such donated foods, funds, assets,or property for his/her own use or gain, knowing such donated foods, funds,assets, or property have been embezzled, willfully misapplied, stolen,or obtained by fraud shall be subject to Federal criminal prosecution undersection 12(g) of the National School Lunch Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. 1760(g))or section 4(c) of the Agriculture and Consumer Protection Act of 1973,as amended (7 U.S.C. 612c note). For the purpose of this paragraph ``funds,assets, or property'' include, but are not limited to funds accruing fromthe sources identified in andSection; 250.15(f) (1) and (2), donated foodswhich have been processed into different end products as provided for underSubpart C of this part, and the containers in which donated foods havebeen received from the Department. Distributing agencies shall immediatelynotify FNSRO of any suspected violation of section 12(g) or section 4(c)to allow the Department, in conjunction with the U.S. Department of Justice,to determine whether Federal criminal prosecution under section 12(g) orsection 4(c) is warranted. Prosecution of violations by the Federal Governmentshall not relieve any distributing agency of its obligation to obtain recoveryfor improperly distributed or lost donated foods, as required by andSection;250.15(c).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.14 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Storage facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Standards for storage facilities. </T3>Distributing agencies, subdistributingagencies and recipient agencies shall provide facilities for the handling,storage and distribution of donated foods which:(1) Are sanitary and free from rodent, bird, insect and other animal infestation;(2) Safeguard against theft, spoilage and other loss;(3) Maintain foods at proper storage temperatures;(4) Stock and space foods in a manner so that USDA-donated foods are readilyidentified;(5) Store donated food off the floor in a manner to allow for adequateventilation; and(6) Take other protective measures as may be necessary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Distributing agencies, subdistributing agencies and recipient agenciesshall ensure that storage facilities have obtained all required Federal,State and/or local health inspections and/or approvals and that such inspection/approvalsare current.(b) <T3>Reviews. </T3>All distributing agency-level storage facilities shallbe reviewed annually. Distributing agencies shall ensure that subdistributingand recipient agencies. Conduct annual reviews of their respective storagefacilities. Documentation shall be maintained on file at the distributingagency or local level as appropriate to reflect compliance with this section,including documentation of corrective action in cases of noncompliance.Corrective action must be taken immediately on all deficiencies identifiedin the review and the result of the corrective action must be forwardedto the distributing agency. Where applicable, the distributing agency shalldetermine and pursue claims in accordance with andSection; 250.15(c).(c) <T3>Contracts. </T3>When contracting for storage facilities, distributingagencies and subdistributing agencies shall enter into written contractsto be effective for no longer than one year. The contract may be extendedat the option of both parties for two additional one year periods. At thetime the contract is extended, the storage facility must update all pertinentinformation and demonstrate that all donated foods received during theprevious contract period have been accounted for. The contract shall, ata minimum, contain the following:(1) Assurance that the storage facilities will be maintained in accordancewith the standards specified in paragraph (a) of this section;(2) Evidence that donated food shall be clearly identified;(3) Assurance that an inventory system shall be maintained and an annualphysical inventory will be conducted; and reconciled with the inventoryrecords;(4) Beginning and ending dates of the contract;(5) A provision for immediate termination of the contract due to noncomplianceon the part of the warehouse management;(6) A provision allowing for termination of the contract for cause by eitherparty upon 30 days written notification;(7) The amount of any insurance coverage, which has been purchased to protectthe value of food items which are being stored; and(8) Express written consent for inspection and inventory by the distributingagency, subdistributing agency, recipient agency, the Comptroller General,the Department or any of their duly authorized representatives.(d) <T3>Physical inventory. </T3>During the annual review required by andSection;250.14(b), distributing agencies, subdistributing agencies and recipientagencies shall take a physical inventory of all storage facilities. Suchinventory shall be reconciled annually with the storage facility's inventoryrecords and maintained on file by the agency which contracted with or maintainedthe storage facility. Food items which have been lost, stolen or foundto be out-of-condition shall be identified during the physical inventoryand reported by the subdistributing or recipient agency to the distributingagency. Potential excessive inventory, as described in paragraph (e) ofthis section, shall be reported by the subdistributing or recipient agencyto the distributing agency. Corrective action shall be taken immediatelyon all deficiencies and inventory discrepancies and the results of thecorrective action forwarded to the distributing agency. Where applicable,the distributing agency shall determine and pursue claims in accordancewith andSection; 250.15(c).(e) <T3>Excessive inventories. </T3>(1) The distributing agency shall determineif a subdistributing or recipient agency's inventories are excessive basedon:(i) The rate of distribution;(ii) Anticipated distribution; and(iii) Other concerns such as logistical and economic considerations.(2) In no case may the inventory level of each donated food in storageexceed a six-month supply unless sufficient justification for additionalinventory has been submitted and approved. Subdistributing agencies andrecipient agencies shall submit justification to the distributing agencyin instances where more than a six-month inventory is needed. Justificationshall be submitted by the distributing agency to the FNSRO for approvalin instances where more than a six-month inventory is needed at the distributingagency level.(3) The distributing agency shall take corrective action to ensure thatexcess inventories at all levels are eliminated and shall document actionstaken to reduce excessive inventories.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial management.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution charges. </T3>(1) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(2)of this section, recipient agencies may be required to pay part or allof the intrastate costs of distribution through a system of charges assessedby the distributing or subdistributing agencies. Any system of assessmentoperated by the distributing or subdistributing agency shall have the priorapproval of and be subject to review by the FNSRO. The charges assessedshall be used solely in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (f)of this section.(2) For the period May 1, 1983, through September 30, 1988, whenever acommodity is donated to a State without charge or credit against entitlement,recipient agencies may not be assessed for any part of the intrastate costsof storage and transportation of such commodity that is in excess of thedistributing or subdistributing agency's direct costs for such storageand transportation minus any amount that the Department provides to theState to pay such costs under Part 251 of this chapter.(3) Under no circumstances shall recipients be required to make any paymentsin money, materials, or services for or in connection with the receiptof donated foods, nor shall voluntary contributions be solicited (exceptfor the nutrition programs for the elderly) in connection with the receiptof donated foods for any purpose.(b) <T3>Sale of containers. </T3>When containers or packing materials in whichdonated foods are received are disposed of by sale, the proceeds of suchsale shall be used solely in accordance with the provisions of paragraph(f)(2) of this section.(c) <T3>Claims</T3>. If a distributing agency improperly distributes or usesany donated foods, or causes loss of or damage to a donated food throughits failure to provide proper storage, care, or handling, the distributingagency shall, at the Department's option.(1) Replace the donated food in its distribution program in kind, or, inthe case of section 6 donated foods, where replacement in kind may notbe practicable, with other similar foods, or(2) Pay to the Department the value of the donated food as determined bythe Department.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Upon the happening of any event creating a claim in favor of a distributingagency against a subdistributing agency, recipient agency, warehouseman,carrier or other person, for the improper distribution, use, or loss of,or damage to, a donated food, the distributing agency shall take actionto obtain recovery. All amounts collected by such action shall, at theDepartment's option, be used in accordance with the provisions of paragraph(c)(1) of this section, or, except for amounts collected on claims involvingsection 6 donated foods, shall be expended for program purposes in accordancewith the provisions of paragraph (f) of this section. Determinations bya distributing agency that a claim has or has not arisen in favor of thedistributing agency against a subdistributing agency, recipient agency,warehouseman, carrier or other person, shall, at the option of the Department,be approved by the Department prior to the distributing agency taking actionthereon. Where prior approval has not been given by the Department, a distributingagency's claim determinations shall be subject to review by the Department.In the case of an inventory shortage, when the loss of any one commoditydoes not exceed one percent of the total quantity of the donated food distributedor utilized from any single storage facility during the fiscal year inwhich the loss occurred, or during the period for which an audit was conductedby representatives of the Department, or, if approved by FNS, during theperiod for which an audit was conducted by the distributing agency, ifthe distributing agency finds that: (i) The cause of the shortage cannotbe established, (ii) the lost donated foods were held in non-commercialstorage or other facilities owned or operated by the distributing agency,a subdistributing agency or a recipient agency, and (iii) there is no indicationthat the loss was the result of negligence or continued inefficiency inoperations, the distributing agency need not take any further claims action,but the factual basis for not taking further claims action shall be subjectto review by the Department. Furthermore, distributing agencies shall notbe required to file or pursue a claim for a loss which does not exceedan amount established by State law, regulations, or procedure as a minimumamount for which a claim will be made for State losses generally, but nosuch claim shall be disregarded where there is evidence of violation ofFederal or State statutes. Distributing agencies which fail to pursue claimsarising in their favor, or fail to provide for the right to assert suchclaims, or fail to require their subdistributing agencies and recipientagencies to provide for such rights in accordance with andSection; 250.12(b),shall be responsible to the Department for replacing the donated foodsor paying the value thereof in accordance with the provisions of paragraph(c)(1) or (2) of this section. Distributing agencies which pursue claimsarising in their favor, but fail to obtain full restitution shall not beliable to the Department for any deficiency unless the Department determinesthat the distributing agency fraudulently or negligently failed to takereasonable action to obtain restitution. The Department may, at its option,require assignment to it of any claim arising from the distribution ofdonated foods.(d) <T3>Demurrage. </T3>Demurrage or other charges which accrue after a caror truck has been placed for unloading by the delivering carrier, or whichaccrue because placement of a car or truck is prevented, shall be borneby the distributing agency, except that demurrage or other charges maybe borne by the Department where such charges accrue because of actionsby the Department and without the fault or negligence of the distributingagency.(e) <T3>Redonation expenditures. </T3>In accordance with andSection; 250.13(g),whenever a distributing agency requests authority to make redonation ofany donated foods and the Department requests that the donated foods befederally inspected, these inspections will be made at the expense of thedistributing agency. Any donated foods which the Department determinesare acceptable for redonation shall be moved at the distributing agency'sexpense to the closest point within the FNS region in which the State islocated where it can be utilized, or to a closer point outside the region,if such a transfer is mutually agreed to by the Department and the distributingagency. In those instances in which the distributing agency satisfactorilydemonstrates to the Department that the need for any redonation resultedfrom no fault or negligence on its part, the Department shall assume suchtransportation costs as it determines to be proper. Whenever a redonationis made at the request of the Department, the Department shall pay alltransportation and handling costs in connection with such redonation andshall pay to the distributing agency all storage and handling costs accruedon the donated foods at the time of redonation, as determined by the Department,except when the request is made as a result of negligence on the part ofthe distributing agency.(f) <T3>Use of funds accruing in operation of the program. </T3>(1) <T3>Funds accruing from claims. </T3>Funds accruing from recoveries fromloss or damage claims (which are authorized under paragraph (c) of thissection to be expended for program purposes) shall be used only for thepayment of expenses of the food distributing program, including transportation,storage and handling or donated foods, salaries of persons directly connectedwith the program, and other administrative expenses. In accordance withparagraph (f)(4) of this section, the receipt and expenditure of fundsso accrued shall be reviewed by the distributing agency to determine thatfund balances are not in excess of program needs.(2) <T3>Other funds. </T3>Funds accruing from the sale of containers, packingmaterials, salvage of donated foods, distribution charges, or insuranceshall be returned to the Department or used only for the payment of expensesof the program which will improve program operations including, but notlimited to, transportation, storage and handling of donated foods, salariesof persons directly connected with the program and other program-relatedexpenses. Funds accruing from the collection of distribution charges whichare determined to be in excess of program needs pursuant to paragraph (f)(4)of this section shall be used in accordance with that paragraph. Fundsaccruing from the operation of the program shall not be used for thosecosts which are unallowable under the cost Principles in the Department'sUniform Federal Assistance Regulations, 7 CFR Part 3015, Subpart T. Theseunallowable costs include, but are not limited to:(i) Bad debts;(ii) Contingencies;(iii) Contributions and donations;(iv) Entertainment;(v) Fines and penalties;(vi) Governor's expenses; (vii) Interest and other financial costs;(viii) Legislative expenses; and(ix) Losses on other grants.(3) <T3>Segregation of funds. </T3>Distributing agencies and subdistributingagencies shall maintain two separate accounts for funds accruing from programoperations. Funds accruing from the collection of distribution chargesshall be maintained in an operating account. Funds accruing from the saleof containers, salvage of foods, insurance and recoveries of claims forthe loss or damage of donated foods shall be maintained in a salvage account.(4) <T3>Excess funds. </T3>The distributing agency shall review the receiptand expenditures of funds annually to ensure that fund balances are notin excess of program needs. At a maximum, the operating account fund shallnot exceed the sum of the previous year's highest three-month expenditures.Funds exceeding this maximum shall be considered in excess of program needsunless the distributing agency provides sufficient justification as tothe need for such funds and receives approval from the FNSRO. FNSRO maydetermine that funds equal to or less than the expenditures for the previousyear's highest three months are in excess of what is needed. In such instances,the distributing agency shall reduce the excess funds in the operatingaccount by reducing distributing charges or returning the funds to thecontributor. The salvage account will have no set limit. FNSRO must, however,give prior approval to each deposit to or expenditure from the salvagefund which is in excess of $2,500. The distributing agency shall imposeupon subdistributing agencies and recipient agencies similar provisionsfor the use of such funds accruing from the operation of their programs.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of records.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General requirements. </T3>(1) Accurate and complete records shallbe maintained with respect to the receipt, distribution/use and inventoryof donated foods including: (i) End products processed from donated foods and (ii) The determination made as to liability for any improper distribution,use of, loss of, or damage to, such foods and the results obtained fromthe pursuit of claims by the distributing agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Such records shall also be maintained with respect to the receiptand disbursement of funds arising from the operation of the distributionprogram, including the determination as to the amount of payments to bemade by any processor, upon termination of processing contracts.(2) Distributing agencies shall require all subdistributing and recipientagencies to maintain accurate and complete records with respect to thereceipt, distribution/disposal and inventory of donated foods, includingend products processed from donated foods, and with respect to any fundswhich arise from the operation of the distribution program, including refundsmade to recipient agencies by processors in accordance with andSection; 250.30(k).(3) Unless a distributing agency maintains an offer-and-acceptance systemin accordance with andSection; 250.48(e), the distributing agency shall maintainaccurate and complete records with respect to amounts and value of commoditiesrefused by school food authorities. School food authorities shall alsobe required to maintain such records of refusals.(4) Each processor, food service management company, warehouse, or otherentity which contracts with a distributing agency, subdistributing agencyor recipient agency shall be required to keep accurate and complete recordswith respect to the receipt, distribution/disposal, storage and inventoryof such foods similar to those required of distributing agencies underthis paragraph. Where donated foods have been commingled with commercialfoods, the processor shall maintain records which permit an accurate determinationof the donated-food inventory. The processor shall also be required tokeep formula, recipes, daily or batch production records, loadout sheets,bills of lading, and other processing and shipping records to substantiatethe use made of such foods and their subsequent redelivery, in whateverform, to any distributing agency, subdistributing agency or recipient agency.Processors must maintain records which will permit a determination regardingcompliance with the contracting provisions required by andSection; 250.30(f)(3) and (4) as well as maintain records used as the basis for compilingthe processor performance reports required by andSection; 250.30(m).(5) All recipient agencies shall be required to keep accurate and completerecords showing the data and method used to determine the number of eligiblepersons served by that agency.(6) Failure by a distributing agency, subdistributing agency, recipientagency, processor, food service management company, warehouse or otherentity to maintain records required by this Section shall be consideredprima facie evidence of improper distribution or loss of donated foodsand the agency, processor or entity shall be subject to the provisionsof andSection; 250.13(e).(b) <T3>Length of maintenance. </T3>All records required by this Section shallbe retained for a period of three years from the close of the fiscal yearto which they pertain. However, in instances when claims action and/oraudit findings have not been resolved, the records shall be retained aslong as required for the resolution of such action or findings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports</ITAG>(a) <T3>Monthly Report of Receipt and Distribution of Donated Foods (FNS-155).</T3>Distributing agencies shall complete and submit to the FNSRO monthlyinventory reports covering the receipt and distribution of donated foodson Form FNS-155 or other format approved by FNS. The report shall be submittedno later than 30 calendar days after the end of the reporting month. Thedistributing agency shall submit a list of individual food orders receivedfor each food item delivered by the Department as an attachment to theFNS-155.(b) <T3>Processing inventory reports. </T3>Distributing agencies shall completeand submit a quarterly processing inventory report in accordance with andSection;250.30(o).(c) <T3>Performance reports. </T3>Monthly reports of performance shall be submittedby processors to distributing agencies in accordance with andSection; 250.30(m).(d) <T3>Other reports. </T3>Distributing agencies shall complete and submitother reports relative to distribution operations in such form as may berequired from time to time by the Department.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Reporting requirements contained in paragraph (a) approved by theOffice of Management and Budget under control number 0584-0001. Reportingrequirements contained in paragraph(d) approved by the Office of Managementand Budget under control numbers 0584-0028, 0584-0109, 0584-0288 and 0584-0293).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Audits.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Right of inspection and audit. </T3>The Secretary, the ComptrollerGeneral of the United States, or any of their duly authorized representatives,may inspect and inventory donated foods in storage or the facilities usedin the handling or storage of such donated foods, and may inspect and auditall records, including financial records, and reports pertaining to thedistribution of donated foods and may review or audit the procedures andmethods used in carrying out the requirements of this Part at any reasonabletime. Subdistributing agencies, recipient agencies, processors, food servicemanagement companies and warehouses shall be required to permit similarinspection and audit by such entities or their representatives. Fiscalmatters shall continue to be reviewed in audits under the Single AuditAct (31 U.S.C. 7501-07) and the Department's Uniform Federal AssistanceRegulations (7 CFR Part 3015).(b) <T3>Independent CPA audits of multi-State processors. </T3>(1) For anyyear in which a multi-State processor receives more than $250,000 in donatedfoods, the processor shall obtain an independent CPA (certified publicaccountant) audit for that year. Multi-State processors which receive $75,000to $250,000 in donated food each year shall obtain an independent CPA auditevery two years and those which receive less than $75,000 in donated foodseach year shall obtain an independent CPA audit every three years. Thosemulti-State processors which are in the two or three-year audit cycle shallmove into the next audit cycle at the point in time in which the valueof donated foods received reaches $75,000 or $250,000 in any year. In instancesin which the Department determines that the audit is not acceptable orthat the audit has disclosed serious deficiencies, the processor shallbe subject to additional audits at the request of FNS.(2) Audits shall be conducted in accordance with the auditing provisionsset forth under the Uniform Federal Assistance Regulations (7 CFR Part3015, Subpart I) and the FNS Audit Guide for Multi-State Processors. Atthe discretion of FNS, auditors will be required to attend training sessionsconducted by the Department.(3) The costs of the audits, including those costs associated with training,shall be borne by the processors.(4) Audit findings relative to those elements associated with the processingof donated food shall be submitted to the processor and to FNS concurrently.(5) Noncompliance with the audit requirements in paragraph (b)(1) of thissection will render the processor ineligible to enter into another processingcontract with any contracting agency until the required audit has beenconducted and deficiencies corrected.(6) <T3>Processor response. </T3>Multi-State processors shall develop a writtenresponse to FNS addressing deficiencies which have been identified in theaudit. Such responses shall include:(i) Corrective action which has already been taken to eliminate the deficiency;(ii) Corrective action which the processor proposes to take to eliminatethe deficiency;(iii) The timeframes for the implementation and completion of the correctiveaction;(iv) A determination of what caused the deficiency; and(v) Deficiencies which have been identified that the processor takes exceptionto and an explanation for the exception. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Multi-State processors shall submit a written response to FNS in accordancewith timeframes established by FNS.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.19 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reviews.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Each distributing agency shall establish a review systemin order to assess the effectiveness of its food distribution program inmeeting the requirements of these regulations.(b) <T3>Responsibilities of distributing agencies. </T3>(1) Each distributingagency shall establish review procedures encompassing eligibility, foodordering procedures, storage practices, inventory controls, reporting andrecordkeeping requirements and compliance with nondiscrimination provisions.The procedures shall include:(i) An on-site review of all charitable institutions, nutrition programsfor the elderly and nonprofit summer camps for children under agreementin accordance with andSection; 250.12(b) at least once every 4 years, withnot fewer than 25 percent of each of these recipient agency categoriesbeing reviewed each year. These reviews shall also include on-site reviewsof storage facilities to ensure compliance with andSection; 250.14(a);(ii) An on-site review at least once every 2 years of all processors exceptthose that are multi-State processors as defined in andSection; 250.3, withno fewer than 50 percent being reviewed each year;(iii) An annual on-site review of each storage facility utilized by thedistributing agency. On-site reviews conducted by FNS may be consideredas contributing to the fulfillment of the minimum coverage required bythis paragraph; and(iv) A biennial review of all food service mangement companies under contractwith recipient agencies in accordance with andSection; 250.12(c) which arenot under contract with a school participating in the National School LunchProgram or a Commodity School under Part 210 of this chapter, or a schoolparticipating in the School Breakfast Program under Part 220 of this chapter.(2) Each distributing agency shall design and implement a system to verifysales of end products to all recipient agencies under that distributingagency's authority in instances when a processor transfers end productsto a distributor and the distributor sells the end product to the recipientagencies at a discount and the distributor receives a refund from the processor.At a minimum, such a system must:(i) Provide for the quarterly review of a statistically valid sample ofsales information of all processors which contract with the distributingagency or contracting agencies under the authority of the distributingagency, including multi-State processors;(ii) Support the projection of a claim against the processor when, in thereview of the sample, it is determined that the value of donated foodshas not been passed on to recipient agencies or when end products havebeen improperly distributed; and(iii) Provide for the assessment of claims against the processor in accordancewith FNS Instruction 410-1 Non-Audit Claims, Food Distribution Program,in instances when deficiencies have been identified. Distributing agenciesmay delegate the responsibility of sales verification to processors. Insuch instances, the distributing agency must establish guidelines whichthe processor must follow in conducting sales verification. These guidelinesmust ensure that a statistically valid sample of sales is verified quarterly.Processors shall report their findings to the distributing agency on aquarterly basis in accordance with andSection; 250.30(m).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Distributing agencies must review the processor's sales verificationsystem and the processor's findings for adequacy and submit a copy of thereview report of the system findings to the appropriate FNSRO.(3) The distributing agency shall submit a report of review findings toeach entity reviewed. The report shall include:(i) Each deficiency found;(ii) The factors contributing to each deficiency;(iii) Recommendations for needed corrective action, including timetablesfor completion and/or claims action to be pursued, if any; and(iv) Provisions for evaluating effectiveness of corrective actions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">A copy of each processor review report shall be provided to the appropriateFNSRO.(4) Distributing agencies shall monitor progress toward completion andthe effectiveness of corrective actions taken in eliminating program deficiences.(5) In addition to the review requirements of paragraph (b)(1) of thissection, each distributing agency shall make a continuing evaluation ofall recipient agencies, and processors by monitoring performance reports,food requests, participation data, and data regarding refunds and discountsto recipient agencies and distributors for the receipt of end products.(6) Distributing agencies shall, where applicable, require that subdistributingagencies monitor and review their operations in accordance with this paragraph.(c) <T3>Responsibilities of State Agencies on Aging.</T3> State Agencies onAging which receive cash payments in lieu of donated foods in accordancewith the provisions of andSection; 250.42(c) shall monitor use of such cashafter disbursement to nutrition programs for the elderly to ensure thatthe amounts so received are expended solely for the purchase of U.S. agriculturalcommodities and other foods of U.S. origin for such programs.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sanctions.</ITAG>Any distributing agency which has failed to comply with the provisionsof this Part or any instructions or procedures issued in connection withit or any agreements entered into pursuant to it, may, at the discretionof the Department, be disqualified from further participation in any distributionprogram. Reinstatement may be made at the option of the Department. Disqualificationshall not prevent the Department from taking other action through otheravailable means when considered necessary, including prosecution underapplicable Federal statutes.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Civil rights.</ITAG>Distributing agencies, subdistributing agencies and recipient agenciesshall comply with the Department's nondiscrimination regulations (7 CFRParts 15, 15a, and 15b) and the FNS civil rights instructions to ensurethat in the operation of the program no person is discriminated againstbecause of race, color, national origin, age, sex or handicap.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Complaints.</ITAG>Distributing agencies shall investigate promptly complaints received inconnection with the distribution or use of donated foods. Irregularitieswhich are disclosed shall be corrected immediately. Serious irregularitiesshall be promptly reported to the Department. Distributing agencies shallmaintain or file evidence of such investigations and actions. The Departmentalso reserves the right to make investigations and shall have the finaldetermination as to when a complaint has been properly handled. Complaintsalleged on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, sex or handicapshall be handled in accordance with andSection; 250.21.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Processing and Labeling of Donated Foods</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State processing of donated foods.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> This section sets forth the terms and conditions underwhich distributing agencies, subdistributing agencies, or recipient agenciesmay enter into contracts for the processing of donated foods and prescribesthe minimum requirements to be included in such contracts. This sectiondoes not pertain to food service management companies.(b) <T3>Permissible contractual arrangements.</T3> (1) A distributing agency,subdistributing agency, or recipient agency may contract for processing,pay the processing fee, and deliver the end products to eligible recipientagencies through its own distribution system.(2) A distributing agency or subdistributing agency may contract for processingon behalf of one or more recipient agencies. All recipient agencies eligibleto receive the donated foods to be processed may receive end products madefrom those foods and produced under such processing contracts by virtueof the distributing agency_recipient agency agreement required by andSection;250.12(b). Under this arrangement and subject to the approval of the distributingagency:(i) Processors shall utilize either a discount or a refund system as definedin andSection; 250.3 when they sell end products directly to recipient agencies,or(ii) When selling end products through a distributor, processors shallutilize either a refund system or a system which provides refunds to distributorsand discounts to recipient agencies through a distributor in accordancewith paragraph (e) of this section.(3) Distributing agencies shall permit subdistributing agencies and recipientagencies to enter into processing contracts with a processor under arrangementssimilar to those described in paragraph (b) (1) or (2) of this section.(c) <T3>Requirements for processing contracts.</T3> (1) Contracts with processorsshall be in a standard written form and be reviewed by the appropriateFNSRO. Processing contracts shall terminate no later than one year afterthey have been entered into and shall not be extended without being renegotiated.Distributing agencies shall develop criteria for use in evaluating andselecting processing contracts. The selection criteria shall be used inselecting or rejecting processors in a manner that ensures equitable treatmentof processors. The selection criteria shall, at a minimum, include:(1) The nutritional contribution which the end product will provide;(ii) The marketability of the end product;(iii) The distribution method which the processor intends to utilize;(iv) Price and yield schedule data;(v) Any applicable labeling requirements; and(vi) The ability of the processor to meet the terms and conditions setforth in the regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">These criteria will be reviewed by the appropriate FNSRO during themanagement evaluation review of the distributing agency. Distributing agenciesand subdistributing agencies which enter into contracts on behalf of recipientagencies but which do not limit the types of end products which can besold or the number of processors which can sell end products within theState are not required to follow the selection criteria. In addition toutilizing these selection criteria, when a contracting agency enters intoa contract both for the processing of donated food and the purchase ofthe end products produced from the donated food, the procurement standardsset forth in Attachment O to OMB Circular A-102 must be followed. Recipientagencies which purchase end products produced under Statewide agreementsare also required to comply with Attachment O of OMB Circular A-102. Contractingagencies shall not enter contracts with processors which cannot demonstratethe ability to meet the terms and conditions of the regulations and thedistributing agency agreements; furnish prior to the delivery of any donatedfoods for processing, a performance bond, an irrevocable letter of creditor an escrow account in an amount sufficient to protect the contract valueof donated food on hand and on order; demonstrate the ability to distributeend products to eligible recipient agencies; provide a satisfactory recordof integrity, business ethics and performance and provide adequate storage.(2) Standard form contracts shall be prepared or reviewed by the appropriateState legal staff to assure conformity with the requirements of these regulationsand of applicable Federal, State and local laws.(3) The contract shall be signed for the processor by the owner, a partner,or a corporate officer duly authorized to sign the contract, as follows:(i) In a sole proprietorship, the owner shall sign the contract;(ii) In a partnership, a partner shall sign the contract;(iii) In a corporation, a duly authorized corporate officer shall signthe contract.(4) At a minimum, each processing contract shall include:(i) The names and telephone numbers of the contracting agency and processor;(ii) A description of each end product, the quantity of each donated foodand any other ingredient which is needed to yield a specific number ofunits of each end product (except that the contracting agency may permitthe processor to specify the total quantity of any flavorings or seasoningswhich may be used without identifying the ingredients which are, or maybe, components of flavorings or seasonings), and the yield factor for eachdonated food. The yield factor is the percentage of the donated food whichmust be returned in the end product to be distributed to eligible recipientagencies. For substitutable donated foods, at least 100 percent of thedonated foods provided to the processor must be physically contained inthe end products, with no allowable tolerance;(iii) The contract value of each donated food to be processed and, whereprocessing is to be performed only on a fee-for-service basis, the processingfee to the contracting agency for a specified number, weight or measureof the end products to be delivered;(iv) A provision for: (A) Termination of the contract upon thirty days written notice by thecontracting agency or the processor and (B) Immmediate termination of the contract when there has been noncompliancewith its terms and conditions by the contracting agency or the processor;(v) In the event of contract termination, a provision for disposition ofdonated foods and end products in the processor's inventories or paymentof funds in accordance with paragraph (j) of this section;(vi) A provision for inspection and certification during processing, whereapplicable, by the appropriate acceptance service in accordance with paragraphs(g) and (h) of this section;(vii) A provision that end products containing donated foods that are notsubstitutable under paragraph (f) of this section shall be delivered onlyto recipient agencies eligible to receive such foods; (viii) Provisions that the processor shall:(A) Fully account for all donated foods delivered into its possession byproduction and delivery to the contracting agency or eligible recipientagencies of an appropriate number of units of end products meeting thecontract specifications, and where end products are sold through a distributor,that the processor remains full accountable for the donated foods untilrefunds or any other credits equal to their contracted value have beenmade to eligible recipient agencies in accordance with paragraph (k) ofthis section or to distributing agencies in accordance with paragraph (n)(2)of this section; (B) Furnish to the contracting agency prior to the delivery of any donatedfoods for processing documentation that a performance supply and suretybond from a surety company listed in the most recent U.S. Department ofTreasury Circular 570, an irrevocable letter of credit or an escrow accounthas been obtained in an amount that is sufficient to protect the contractvalue of all donated foods. Since the distributing agency is held liableby FNS for any donated foods provided to a processor the distributing agencyshall determine the dollar value of the performance supply and surety bond,irrevocable letter of credit or the escrow account taking into considerationthe (<T3>1</T3>) Value of donated foods on hand; (<T3>2</T3>) Value of donated foods on order and(<T3>3</T3>) Anticipated usage rate during the contract period;(C) Use or dispose of the containers in which donated foods are receivedfrom the Department in accordance with the instructions of the contractingagency;(D) Apply as credit against the processing fee or return to the contractingagency:(<T3>1</T3>) Any funds received from the sale of containers, and(<T3>2</T3>) The market value or the price received from the sale of anyby-products of donated foods or commercial foods which have been substitutedfor donated foods;(E) Substitute donated foods with commercially purchased foods only inaccordance with paragraph (f) of this section;(F) Meet the requirements of paragraph (i) of this section for labelingend products;(G) Maintain accurate and complete records pertaining to the receipt, disposal,and inventory of donated foods in accordance with andSection; 250.16;(H) Submit processing performance reports in accordance with paragraph(m) of this section; and(I) Submit annual reconciliation reports and make payments to distributingagencies for any outstanding refund applications or excessive inventoriesin accordance with paragraph (n)(2) of this section;(ix) A provision that approval of the contract by distributing agency shallnot obligate that agency or the Department to deliver donated foods forprocessing; (x) A description of the processor's quality control system and assurancethat an effective quality control system will be maintained for the durationof the contract; (xi) In instances when the processor is a multi-State processor as definedin andSection; 250.3, a provision that the processor agrees to obtain anindependent audit by a certified public accountant in accordance with andSection;250.18(b); (xii) A requirement that inventory drawdowns shall be limited to the actualamount of donated foods contained in the end product. Additional commodityrequired to account for production loss shall be obtained from non-donatedfoods; (xiii) In instances when end products are sold through a distributor adescription of the system which will be utilized for the sale of the endproducts to a recipient agencies;(xiv) In instances when the distributing agency has delegated the responsibilityfor sales verification for end products provided by a distributor to recipientagencies at a discount, assurance that the processor will submit salesverification data to the distributing agency in accordance with andSection;250.30(m)(l); and (xv) A provision that the contracting agency shall give the processor alist of all recipient agencies eligible to purchase end products underthe contract.(5) The processor shall not assign the processing contract or delegateany aspect of processing under a subcontract or other arrangement withoutthe written consent of the contracting agency and the distributing agency.(d) <T3>End products sold by processors. </T3>When recipient agencies pay theprocessor for end products, the processing contract shall include: (1) The processor's established wholesale price schedule for quantity purchasesof specified units of end products, and   (2) An assurance that the price of each unit of end product purchased byeligible recipient agencies shall be discounted by the stated contractvalue of the donated foods contained therein, or a refund equal to suchvalue made upon proof of purchase by an eligible recipient agency in accordancewith paragraph (k) of this section.  (e) <T3>End products sold by distributors. </T3>When a processor transfersend products to one or more distributors for sale and delivery to recipientagencies, such sales shall be under either a refund system as defined inandSection; 250.3 or a system which provides refunds to distributors anddiscounts to recipient agencies. The processor shall make refund paymentsto distributors or recipient agencies in accordance with paragraph (k)of this section.  (f) <T3>Substitution of donated foods with commercial foods. </T3>(1) The processingcontract may provide for substitution of donated foods as defined in andSection;250.3. If the provision allowing substitution is included, the contractshall stipulate that:  (i) Only butter, cheese, corn grits, corn meal, flour, macaroni, nonfatdry milk, peanut butter, peanut granules, roasted peanuts, rice, rolledoats, rolled wheat, shortening, vegetable oil, spaghetti, and such otherfood as FNS specifically approves may be substituted (substitution of meatand poultry items shall not be permitted),(ii) All components of commercial foods substituted for those donated mustbe of U.S. origin and be identical or superior in every particular of thedonated-food specification as evidenced by certification performed by,or acceptable to, the applicable Federal acceptance service, and (iii) Substitution is allowed without advance approval by the distributingagency only when:   (A) It is necessary to replace donated food with commercial food to meetthe 100 percent yield requirement; or  (B) The donated and commercial foods have been commingled through the useof joint storage tanks or bins; or   (C) The processing contract permits the use of concentrated skim milk whichhas been purchased or manufactured by the processor for donated nonfatdry milk.  (2) Documentation must be maintained by both parties in accordance withandSection; 250.16. When there is substitution, the donated foods shall beused by the processor and shall not otherwise be sold or disposed of inbulk form. The applicable Federal acceptance service shall, upon requestby the Department, the contracting agency or the distributing agency determineif the quality analysis meets the requirements set forth by the AgriculturalStabilization and Conservation Service (ASCS) in the original inspectionof donated foods and, in the case of concentrated skim milk replacing donatednonfat dry milk, determine if the concentrated skim milk contains the amountof milk solids as specified in the contract. When donated foods are nonsubstitutable,the applicable Federal acceptance service shall ensure against unauthorizedsubstitutions, and verify that quantities of donated foods used are asspecified in the contract.  (3) When concentrated skim milk is used to replace donated nonfat dry milk,the contract shall also specify (in addition to the requirements in paragraph(c) of this section):   (i) The percent of milk solids that, at a minimum, must be contained inthe concentrated skim milk;  (ii) The weight ratio of concentrated skim milk to donated nonfat dry milk;(A) The weight ratio is the weight of concentrated skim milk which equalsone pound of donated nonfat dry milk, based on milk solids;  (B) In calculating this weight, nonfat dry milk shall be considered ascontaining 96.5 percent milk solids;  (C) If more than one concentration of concentrated skim milk is to be used,a separate weight ratio must be specified for each concentration;  (iii) The processor's method of verifying that the milk solids contentof the concentrated skim milk is as stated in the contract;  (iv) A requirement that inventory drawdowns of donated nonfat dry milkshall be limited to an amount equal to the amount of concentrated skimmilk, based on the weight ratio, used to produce the end product;  (v) A requirement that the contract value of donated food for a given amountof concentrated skim milk used to produce an end product is the value ofthe equivalent amount of nonfat dry milk, based on the weight ratio ofthe two foods;  (vi) A requirement that the concentrated skim milk shall be produced ina USDA approved plant or in a plant approved by the appropriate regulatoryauthority for the processing of Grade A milk products; and  (vii) A requirement that documentation sufficient to substantiate compliancewith the contract provisions shall be maintained in accordance with andSection;250.16(a)(4).  (4) Except as specified in paragraph (f) (iii) of this section, processorsmust receive approval from the distributing agency prior to any substitution.Distributing agencies may approve a processor's request for substitutiononly when the distributing agency's inability to maintain the necessaryinventory of donated food at the processor would disrupt the productionof end products.  (5) Title to the substituted food shall transfer to the contracting agencyupon the initiation of the processing of the end product containing thesubstituted food. Title to the equivalent amount of donated food shalltransfer to the processor at the same time (except when the substitutionis necessary to meet the 100 percent yield requirement or to otherwisereplace missing or out-of-condition donated food). Once title has transferred,the processor shall use the substituted food in accordance with the termsand conditions of this part.(g) <T3>Meat and poultry inspection programs. </T3>When donated meat or poultryproducts are processed or when any commercial meat or poultry productsare incorporated into an end product containing one or more donated foods,all of the processing shall be performed in plants under continuous Federalmeat or poultry inspection, or continuous State meat or poultry inspectionin States certified to have programs at least equal to the Federal inspectionprograms. In addition to FSIS inspection, all donated meat and poultryprocessing shall be performed under AMS acceptance service grading. Thecost of this service shall be borne by the processor. In the event theprocessor can demonstrate that grading is impractical, exemptions in theuse of acceptance services shall be approved by the distributing agencyprior to processing each order. Exemptions in the use of acceptance servicegraders will be authorized on the basis of each order to be processed providedthe processor can demonstrate:(1) That even with ample notification time, the processor cannot securethe services of a grader,(2) That the cost for a grader would be unduly excessive relative to thevalue of foods being processed and that production runs cannot be combinedor scheduled to enable prorating of the costs of services among the purchasersof end products, or(3) The documented urgency of the recipient agency's need for the end productprecludes the use of acceptance services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Prior to approving a processor's request to waive the acceptance servicerequirement the distributing agency shall ensure, based on the processor'spast performance, that the quality of the end product produced will inno way be adversely affected as a result of waiving the requirement.(h) <T3>Certification by acceptance service. </T3>(1) All processing activitiesof donated foods shall be subject to review and audit by the Department,including the applicable Federal acceptance service. The contracting agencymay also require acceptance and certification by such acceptance servicein addition to the requirements set forth in paragraph (g) of this section.(2) In the case of substitutable donated foods, in deciding whether torequire acceptance and certification, the contracting agency should considerthe dollar value of the donated foods delivered to the processor.(3) When contracting agencies require certification in accordance withparagraph (h) (1) or (2) of this section, the degree of acceptance andcertification necessary under the processing contract shall be determinedby the appropriate Federal acceptance service after consultation with thedistributing agency concerning the type and volume of the donated foodsand anticipated value of end products to be processed. The cost of thisservice shall also be borne by the processor.(i) <T3>Labeling end products. </T3>(1) Except when end products contain donatedfoods that are substituted under paragraph (f) of this section, the exteriorshipping containers of end products and, where practicable, the individualwrappings or containers of end products, shall be clearly labeled ``ContainsCommodities Donated by the United States Department of Agriculture. ThisProduct Shall Be Sold Only to Eligible Recipient Agencies.''(2) Labels on all end products shall meet applicable Federal labeling requirements.(3) When a processor makes any claim with regard to an end product's contributiontoward meal requirements of any child nutrition program, the processorshall follow procedures established by FNS, the Food Safety and InspectionService of the Department, the National Marine Fisheries Service of theU.S. Department of Commerce or other applicable Federal agencies for approvalof such labels.(j) <T3>Termination of processing contracts. </T3>(1) When contracts are terminatedor completed and the processor has commodities remaining in inventory,the processor shall be directed, at the option of the distributing agencyand the FNSRO, to do the following:(i) With respect to nonsubstitutable commodities, the processor shall:(A) Return the commodities to the contracting agency;(B) Pay the contracting agency for the commodities based on the Department'sreplacement costs, determined by using the most recent data provided bythe Department; or(C) Pay the contracting agency for the commodities based on the contractvalue stated in the processor's contract;(ii) With respect to substitutable commodities, the processor shall:(A) With the concurrence of any affected contracting agencies, transferthe donated foods to the accounts of other contracting agencies with whichthe processor has contracts;(B) Return the foods donated to the contracting agency;(C) Replace the commodities with the same foods of equal or better qualityas certified in accordance with paragraph (f)(2) of this section and deliversuch foods to the contracting agency;(D) Pay the contracting agency for the commodities based on the Department'sreplacement costs, determined by using the most recent data provided bythe Department; or(E) Pay the contracting agency for the commodities based on the contractvalue stated in the processor's contract.(2) When a processor's contract is terminated at the processor's requestor due to noncompliance or negligence on the part of the processor andcommodities remaining in the processor's inventory are transported pursuantto paragraph (j)(1)(i)(A), (j)(1)(ii)(B) or (j)(1)(ii)(C) of this section,the processor shall pay the transportation costs.(3) Funds received by distributing agencies upon termination of contractsshall be used in accordance with FNS Instruction 410-1, Non-Audit Claims,Food Distribution Program.(k) <T3>Refund payments. </T3>(1) When end products are sold to recipient agenciesin accordance with the refund provisions of paragraph (d) or (e) of thissection, each recipient agency shall submit refund applications to theprocessor within 60 days of the date of purchase of end products in orderto receive benefits. The recipient agency shall also forward a copy ofthe refund application to the distributing agency at the same time.(2) In instances when refunds are to be provided to distributors whichhave sold end products to recipient agencies at a discount, distributorsshall submit refund applications to processors within 60 days of the dateof sale to recipient agencies in order to receive benefits.(3) Not later than 10 days after receipt of the application by the processor,the processor shall make a payment to the recipient agency or distributorequal to the stated contract value of the donated foods contained in thepurchased end products covered by the application. Copies of requests forrefunds and payments to recipient agencies and/or distributors shall beforwarded to the appropriate distributing agency by the processor.(1) <T3>Contract approvals. </T3>Distributing agencies shall review and approveprocessing contracts entered into by subdistributing and recipient agenciesprior to the delivery of commodities for processing under such contracts.The distributing agency which enters into or approves a processing contractshall provide a copy of the contract and of these regulations to the processors,forward a copy of the contract to the appropriate FNSRO, and retain a copyfor its files. (m) <T3>Performance reports. </T3>(1) Processors shall be required to submitto distributing agencies monthly reports of performance under each processingcontract. Processors contracting with agencies other than a distributingagency shall submit such reports to the distributing agency having authorityover that particular contracting agency. Performance reports shall be receivedno later than the final day of the month following the reporting period.The report shall include: (i) A list of all recipient agencies purchasing end products under thecontract; (ii) Donated-food inventory at the beginning of the reporting period; (iii) Amount of donated foods received during the reporting period; (iv) Amount of donated foods transferred to and/or from existing inventory;(v) Number of units approved end products delivered to each eligible recipientagency during the reporting period and the number of pounds of each donatedfood represented by these delivered end products; (vi) Donated food inventory at the end of the reporting period; (vii) Number of pounds of each donated food represented in sales to distributors;(viii) List of all contracting agencies and their locations with whichthe processor has processing contracts; (ix) In instances in which sales verification has been delegated to theprocessor pursuant to andSection; 250.19(b)(2), sales verification findingsshall be reported as an attachment to the September, December, March andJune performance reports in whatever format the distributing agency deemsnecessary; and (x) A certification statement that sufficient donated foods are in inventoryor on order to account for the quantities needed for production of endproducts for State processing contracts and that the processor has on handor on order adequate quantities of foods purchased commercially to meetthe processor's production requirements for commercial sales. (2) In addition to reporting the information identified in paragraph (m)(1)of this section, processors which substitute concentrated skim milk fordonated nonfat dry milk shall also report the following information forthe reporting period: (i) The number of pounds of nonfat dry milk used in commercial productssold to outlets which are not recipient agencies; and (ii) The number of pounds of concentrated skim milk, and the percent ofmilk solids contained therein, used in end products sold to recipient agencies.(3) Distributing agencies shall review and analyze reports submitted byprocessors to ensure that performance under each contract is in accordancewith the provisions set forth in this section. (n) <T3>Inventory controls. </T3>(1) Distributing agencies shall monitor processorinventories to ensure that the quantity of donated foods for which a processoris accountable is the lowest cost-efficient level but in no event morethan a six-month supply based on the processor's average monthly usage,unless a higher level has been specifically approved by the distributingagency on the basis of a written justification submitted by the processor.Under no circumstances should the amount of donated foods ordered by thecontracting agency for processing purposes be in excess of anticipatedusage or beyond the processor's ability to accept and store the donatedfoods at any one time. Distributing agencies shall make no further distributionto processors whose inventories exceed these limits until such inventorieshave been reduced. (2) For processors substituting concentrated skim milk for donated nonfatdry milk, distributing agencies shall review the processors' monthly performancereports to ensure that: (i) Donated nonfat dry milk inventory is being drawn down based on theamount of milk solids contained in the concentrated skim milk which wasused in end products sold to eligible recipient agencies; (ii) An amount of milk solids equivalent to the amount in the donated nonfatdry milk is contained in end products sold to eligible recipient agencies;and (iii) Donated nonfat dry milk is not being sold in bulk form. (3) Processors shall complete and submit annual reconciliation reportsto distributing agencies within 90 days following the end of the contractperiod. As a part of this annual reconciliation, processors shall pay distributingagencies for the contract value of donated foods. (i) For any donated foods for which a timely refund application has notbeen submitted in accordance with paragraph (k) of this section and (ii) For inventories in excess of a six-month supply. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In instances when the distributing agency has assigned an inventorylevel other than a six-month level, the processor shall pay the contractvalue of any donated food in excess of that level. (4) Distributing agencies shall certify the accuracy of the annual reconciliationreport and forward it to the FNSRO. All monies shall be used in accordancewith FNS Instruction 410-1, Non-Audit Claims, Food Distribution Program.(5) Distributing agencies shall not submit food requisitions for processorsreporting no sales activity during the prior year's contract period unlessdocumentation is submitted by the processor which outlines specific plansfor product promotion or sales expansion. (o) <T3>Processing inventory reports.</T3> (1) Distributing agencies shallsubmit to the FNSRO not later than 60 days following the close of eachFederal fiscal quarter a report showing separately for each processor underagreement with contracting agencies within the State:(i) The donated food inventory at the beginning of the previous quarter;(ii) Amount of donated foods received during the quarter;(iii) Amount of donated foods transferred to and/or from existing inventory;(iv) Amounts of donated foods used during the quarter;(v) Inventory at the close of the quarter;(vi) Each contracting agency and its location with which the processorhas processing contracts.(2) In addition to reporting the information identified in paragraph (o)(1)of this section, for each processor which substitutes concentrated skimmilk for donated nonfat dry milk the distributing agency shall also reportthe following information for the reporting period:(i) The number of pounds of nonfat dry milk used in commercial productssold to nonprogram outlets; and(ii) The number of pounds of concentrated skim milk and the percent ofmilk solids contained therein used in end products sold to recipient agencies.(p) <T3>Cooperation with administering agencies for child nutrition programs.</T3>If the distributing agency which enters into or approves contracts forend products to be used in a child nutrition program does not also administersuch program, it shall collaborate with the administering agency by;(1) Giving that agency an opportunity to review all such contracts to determinewhether end products to be provided contribute to required nutritionalstandards for reimbursement under the applicable regulations for such program(7 CFR Parts 210, 225, and 226) or are otherwise suitable for use in suchprogram;(2) Consulting with the agency with regard to the labeling requirementsfor the end products; and (3) Otherwise requesting technical assistance as needed from that agency.(q) <T3>FNSRO review of contracts and inventory reports.</T3> The FNSRO shall:(1) review all processing contracts and provide guidance, including writtenrecommendations for termination, where necessary, to distributing agenciesconcerning any contracts which do not meet the requirements of this section;(2) Allow distributing agencies 30 days to respond to any recommendationconcerning contracts not meeting the requirements of this section;(3) Review and analyze the processing inventory reports required by paragraph(o) of this section to ensure that no additional donated foods shall bedistributed to processors with excess inventories until such inventorieshave been reduced;(4) Assist distributing agencies in reducing such inventories; and(5) Review annual reconciliation reports required by paragraph (n) of thissection and ensure that payments for outstanding refund applications orexcessive inventories have been made.(r) <T3>Availability of copies of processing contracts.</T3> Contracts enteredinto in accordance with this Section are public records and FNS will providecopies of such contracts to any person upon request. The FNSRO will retaincopies of processing contracts submitted by distributing agencies for aperiod of three years from the close of the Federal fiscal year to whichthey pertain.(s) <T3>Processing activity guidance.</T3> Distributing agencies shall developand provide a processing manual or similar procedural material for guidanceto contracting agencies, recipient agencies, and processors. Distributingagencies must revise these materials as necessary to reflect policy andregulatory changes. This guidance material shall be provided to contractingagencies, recipient agencies and processors at the time of the approvalof the initial agreement by the distributing agency, when there have beenregulatory or policy changes which necessitate changes in the guidancematerials, and upon request. The manual shall include, at a minimum, statementsof the distributing agency's policies and procedures on (1) contract approval,(2) monitoring and review of processing activities, (3) recordkeeping andreporting requirements, (4) inventory controls, and (5) refund applications.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number0584-0007)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Eligible Recipient Agencies and Programs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;250.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nonprofit summer camps for children.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution.</T3> (1) The distributing agency shall distribute donatedfood only to those summer camps which have entered into a written agreementfor participation in the program with the distributing agency in accordancewith andSection;250.12(b). Prior to entering into a written agreement, thesummer camp shall provide verification of its tax exempt status under theInternal Revenue Code. In addition to the terms and conditions set forthin andSection;250.12(b), the written agreement shall, at a minimum, include:(i) The name and location of the summer camp(s);(ii) Number of camps or sites;(iii) Number of sessions to be offered during camping season;(iv) Number of adults and children participating in the activities of thesummer camp at each session;(v) Total number of days meals will be served;(vi) Total number of meals to be served daily;(vii) Assurance that tax exempt status will be maintained;(viii) Indication of whether the summer camp(s) will employ the servicesof a food service management company;(ix) Assurance that a brochure or public announcement of open admissionpolicy will be provided and that the summer camp agrees to maintain racial/ethnicdata;(x) Assurance that a physical inventory will be conducted and reconciledat the end of the camping session; and(xi) Assurance that any excess inventory will, at the distributing agency'soption, be returned to the distributing agency for redonation or transferredin accordance with andSection;250.13(a)(1).(2) Distributing agencies shall distribute donated foods only after determiningthat the number of adults participating in camp activities, as comparedwith the number of children 18 years of age and under, is not unreasonablein light of the nature of the camp and the characteristics of the childrenin attendance. Persons 19 years of age and over, including program directors,counselors and others who engage in recreational, educational, and directadministrative functions, are to be considered as adults participatingin the activities of a summer camp. Employees whose presence on camp premisesis solely for the purpose of performing duties such as cooking, gardening,property maintenance or similar support functions are not considered asadults participating in summer camp activities. In addition, persons suchas nurses, therapists, and attendants who perform professional, supervisory,or custodial services are not considered as adults participating in theactivities of a summer camp if they perform services essential to the participationof mentally, emotionally, or physically handicapped children.(3) Distributing agencies shall authorize the transfer or redonation ofall donated foods remaining in summer camps at the end of the camping seasonin accordance with andSection; 250.13 (a) or (g) respectively.(4) Nonprofit summer camps for children may employ food service managementcompanies to conduct food service operations in accordance with andSection;250.12(c).(b) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods. </T3>Distribution of donatedfood to eligible summer camps shall be made on the basis of the averagenumber of meals to be served daily to children as evidence by the mostrecent written caseload factor information contained in the agreement.(c) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>Nonprofit summercamps for children are eligible to receive donated foods under section416, section 32, section 709 and section 4(a).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Charitable institutions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution. </T3>(1) The distributing agency shall distribute donatedfood only to those charitable institutions which have entered into a writtenagreement for participation in the program with the distributing agencyin accordance with andSection; 250.12(b). Prior to entering into a writtenagreement, the charitable institution shall provide verification of theinstitution's tax exempt status under the Internal Revenue Code. In additionto the terms and conditions set forth in andSection; 250.12(b), written agreementsshall, at a minimum, include:(i) The name and location of the charitable institution;(ii) Total number of days meals will be served;(iii) Average daily number of participants; (iv) Total number of meals by type to be served daily to needy persons;(v) Data that shows the number of needy persons receiving benefits underanother means-tested program or financial data that show the total annualamount of funds received by the institution that are derived, respectively,from (A) subsidized income and (B) nonsubsidized income. For the purposeof this Section ``subsidized income'' shall mean income from public taxfunds which are provided on behalf of participants that have been determinedto be in need of financial assistance through a means-tested program suchas Medicaid or income received through private federally tax exempt contributionswhich are provided for the care of participants which the institution haddetermined to be in need of financial assistance. ``Nonsubsidized income''shall mean all other income, including payments made on behalf of participantsby persons legally responsible for their support;(vi) Indication of whether the charitable institution will employ the servicesof a food service management company to conduct its food service operations;(vii) Assurance that proper inventory controls will be maintained; and(viii) Assurance that all reports will be submitted as required by thedistributing agency.(2) Adult correctional institutions are eligible to receive donated foodsas charitable institutions, to the extent that needy persons are served,if they conduct rehabilitation programs that are: (i) Available to either a majority of the total inmate population (includinginmates awaiting trial or sentencing) or to a majority of sentenced inmates;and(ii) Of sufficient scope to permit participation for a minimum of 10 hoursper week per inmate by either a majority of the total inmate populationor a majority of sentenced inmates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Prior to entering into an agreement for donation of foods to an adultcorrectional institution, the distributing agency shall require the institution'sdirector or other repsonsible official to provide a written statement certifyingthat the institution conducts such rehabilitation programs. The statementshall be reviewed annually and maintained as part of the agreement.(3) Charitable institutions may employ food service management companiesto conduct food service operations in accordance with andSection; 250.12(c).(b) <T3>Quantities of donated foods.</T3> Distribution of donated foods toeligible charitable institutions shall be made on the basis of the averagenumber of meals served daily to needy persons. To determine the numberof needy persons being served, the distributing agency shall determinethe proportion of subsidized income by dividing the subsidized income bythe total subsidized and nonsubsidized income (as defined in paragraph(a)(1) of this section) and multiplying that number by the average dailynumber of participants as required in andSection; 250.41(a)(1)(v), or bysimply counting the number of participants that receive benefits underanother a means-tested program. The distributing agency shall use the incomeand average daily participation figures reflected in the agreement in determiningthe number of needy persons being served by the institution in accordancewith the above formula. Income and participation figures shall be basedon the institution's records for the previous year. The distributing agencyshall obtain updated pertinent information by September 30 of each fiscalyear.(c) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>Charitable institutionsare eligible to receive donated foods under section 416, section 32, section4(a), and section 709.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number0584-0305)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nutrition programs for the elderly.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution. </T3>Distributing agencies shall distribute donated foodsonly to nutrition programs for the elderly which have entered into an agreementfor donation of commodities in accordance with andSection; 250.12(b). Foodservice management companies may be employed to conduct food service operationsin accordance with andSection; 250.12(c).(b) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods. </T3>(1) <T3>Quantities. </T3>Distribution of donated foods to nutrition programsfor the elderly shall be based on the level of assistance per meal as requiredby the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, and on the number of eligiblemeals served within the State as evidenced by written caseload factor informationprovided by the State Agency on Aging.(2) <T3>Value. </T3>(i) For the fiscal years 1986 through 1991, the quantityof donated foods to be made available to each State Agency on Aging fordistribution to nutrition programs for the elderly shall be valued at notless than 56.76 cents for each meal which such State Agency on Aging, inaccordance with regulations and guidelines authorized by the Commissioneron Aging, United States Department of Health and Human Services, reportsas having been served or, where necessary, estimates will be served withinthe State or to Indian Tribal Organizations during the year: <T3>Provided, however, </T3>That:(A) This quantity will be reduced to the extent that a State Agency onAging elects to receive cash in lieu of donated foods in accordance withparagraph (c) of this section and(B) The quantity of donated foods to be provided to any State Agency onAging for any fiscal year shall not be adjusted on the basis of meal reportsor estimates submitted after July 1 of such fiscal year.(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b)(2)(i) of this section,in any fiscal year in which compliance with paragraph (b)(2)(i) of thissection costs more than the amounts authorized to be appropriated underthe Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended for that fiscal year, the Secretaryshall reduce the cents per meal level determined pursuant to paragraph(b)(2)(i) of this section for that fiscal year as necessary to meet theauthorization of appropriations for that fiscal year. If such action isnecessary, the per meal level will be reduced uniformly for each meal servedduring that fiscal year.(c) <T3>Cash in lieu of donated foods. </T3>(1) Any State Agency on Aging may,for the purposes of the programs authorized by Titles III and VI of theOlder Americans Act of 1965, as amended, elect to receive cash paymentsin lieu of all or any portion of the donated foods that it would otherwisereceive under paragraph (b) of this section during any fiscal year.(2) When a State Agency on Aging elects to receive cash payments in lieuof donated foods, that election shall be binding on the State Agency onAging for the entire fiscal year to which it pertains, and FNS shall makecash payments to the State Agency on Aging equivalent in value to the donatedfoods that would otherwise have been provided. Cash payments shall be madefor each fiscal quarter by means of Letters of Credit issued by FNS throughthe appropriate U.S. Treasury Regional Disbursing Office or, where applicable,by means of U.S. Treasury checks, based on the best data available to FNSas to the number of meals to be served by nutrition programs for the elderlyadministered by each State Agency on Aging during that fiscal quarter.(3) In instances when it is necessary to reduce the annual level of assistancespecified in paragraph (b)(2)(i) of this section, the level will be reducedin accordance with paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of this section. Once it has beenestablished that the reduced per meal level will be sufficient to avoidany further adjustment, any remaining funds (up to the level of assistancespecified in paragraph (b)(2)(i) of this section) will be disbursed sothat each State will receive an equal amount on a per meal basis.(4) To be eligible for reimbursement by FNS, claims for cash payment formeals served by nutrition programs for the elderly shall be submitted byState Agencies on Aging and Indian Tribal Organizations no later than 90days following the close of the Federal fiscal quarter for which paymentis claimed.(5) The State Agency on Aging desiring to receive funds under this paragraphshall enter into a written agreement with FNS pursuant to andSection; 250.12(a)to:(i) Promptly and equitably disburse any cash it receives in lieu of donatedfoods to nutrition programs for the elderly after consideration of theneeds of such programs and the availability of other resources, includingany donated foods available under paragraph (b) of this section;(ii) Establish such procedures as may be necessary to ensure that the cashdisbursements are used by nutrition programs for the elderly solely forthe purpose of purchasing U.S. agricultural commodities and other foodsof U.S. origin for their food service operations; (iii) Maintain and retain for 3 years from the close of the Federal fiscalyear to which they pertain complete and accurate records of:(A) All amounts received and disbursed under paragraph (c) of this sectionand(B) The manner in which consideration was given to the needs and resourcesas required by paragraph (c)(5)(i) of this section; and(iv) Permit representatives of the Department and of the General AccountingOffice of the United States to inspect, audit, and copy such records atany reasonable time.(6) Funds provided under paragraph (c) of this section shall be subjectto the Department's Uniform Federal Assistance Regulations (7 CFR Part3015).(d) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>Nutrition programsfor the elderly are eligible to receive donated foods under section 416,section 32, section 311, section 709, and section 14.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disaster organizations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Eligibility. </T3>In instances in which the President has declareda major disaster or emergency pursuant to section 301 of the Disaster ReliefAct of 1974, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5141) and the Secretary has determinedthat as a result of the major disaster or emergency low-income householdsare unable to purchase adequate amounts of nutritious food, disaster organizationsmay be eligible to receive donated foods for congregate meal service orhousehold distribution to disaster victims. Disaster organizations shallremain eligible for disaster assistance for as long as the Secretary determinesnecessary, taking into consideration the consequences of the major disasteror emergency on the earning power of the disaster victims; <T3>Except, </T3>that in areas where the Food Stamp Program is in operation,donated foods may be distributed for household use only so long as theSecretary finds that the commercial channels of trade have been disruptedbecause of a major disaster or emergency. Prior to providing donated foodsto disaster organizations, the distributing agency shall require the disasterorganization to make application for the receipt and distribution of donatedfoods in accordance with paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section. Such applicationsshall be confirmed in writing and maintained in accordance with the recordkeepingrequirements of this part.(b) <T3>Distribution of donated foods for use in providing congregate mealservice. </T3>(1) In order to obtain donated foods for use in providingcongregate meal service, disaster organizations shall request approvalfrom the appropriate distributing agency, giving the following informationto the extent possible:(i) Description of major disaster or emergency situation; (ii) Number of people requiring meals and congregate meal service period;(iii) Quantity and types of food needed for congregate meal service; and(iv) Number and location of sites providing congregate meal service.(2) Following its approval of the request for donated foods, the distributingagency is authorized and shall make appropriate donated foods availablefrom any sources within the State to the disaster organization and within24 hours shall report to the appropriate FNSRO the information listed inparagraph (b)(1) of this section.(c) <T3>Household distribution. </T3>In order to obtain donated foods for householddistribution in areas served by the Food Stamp Program when commercialfood distribution channels are disrupted, the distributing agency shallrequest prior approval by the appropriate FNSRO. In the request, the distributingagency shall cite the following information:(i) Description of major disaster or emergency situation;(ii) Number of households affected;(iii) Anticipated distribution period;(iv) Method of distribution available; and(v) Quantity and types of food needed for distribution.(d) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods. </T3>The distributing agencyshall make donated foods available to eligible disaster organizations basedon the caseload factor information provided by the disaster organization.(e) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>Disaster organizationsproviding major disaster or other emergency food assistance under thisPart are eligible to receive donated foods under section 416, section 32,section 709, section 4(a) and sections 409 and 410 of the Disaster ReliefAct of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5181-82), as amended.(f) <T3>Summary report. </T3>Within 30 days following termination of the disasterassistance, the distributing agency shall provide a summary report to theappropriate FNSRO using Form FNS-292, Report of Coupon Issuance and CommodityDistribution for Disaster Relief.(g) <T3>Replacement. </T3>To the extent donated foods are available, FNS willreplace donated foods used from the States' stocks for major disaster andemergency assistance. The distributing agency shall request the replacementof foods used for major disaster and other emergency food assistance, inwriting to FNSRO, no later than 30 days following termination of the disasterassistance.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special group food assistance programs.</ITAG>In situations of distress in which needs for food assistance cannot bemet under other provisions of this part, a distributing agency may, uponrequest to and approval by the Secretary, distribute donated foods to anyinstitution, or to any association of persons engaged in charitable activities,for use in conducting special group-feeding programs on a temporary basisfor persons in need of such food assistance. Such distributions shall notexceed 30 days. The distributing agency, and any such institution or association,shall conduct any distribution under this Section in accordance with suchinstructions as the Secretary may specify, and any such institution orassociation shall give to the distributing agency an assurance that feedingprograms will be conducted in accordance with the instructions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Commodity Supplemental Food Program.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution. </T3>The distributing agency shall distribute donatedfoods to the State agency which is designated by the State to administerthe Commodity Supplemental Food Program for that State and which has enteredinto a written agreement with the Department for the administration ofthat program in accordance with 7 CFR Part 247, the regulations for thatprogram. The State agency administering the Commodity Supplemental FoodProgram shall distribute donated foods to local agencies for use by eligiblerecipients in accordance with the provisions of 7 CFR Part 247 and withthe provisions of this Part, and may enter into an agreement with the distributingagency for use of the distributing agency's facilities for distribution.(b) <T3>Quantities of donated foods. </T3>Distribution of donated foods tothe designated State agencies for the Commodity Supplemental Food Programshall be made on the basis of each State agency's quarterly estimate ofneed.(c) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>State agenciesdistributing donated foods through the Commodity Supplemental Food Programare eligible to receive such foods under section 32, section 416, section709 and section 4(a).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.46</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Food Distribution Program in the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution. </T3>The distributing agency shall make donated foodsavailable for distribution to households in the Trust Territory of thePacific Islands by those welfare agencies which certify households in accordancewith a plan of operation approved by FNS, as required by paragraph (d)of this section. Distribution of donated foods to households shall be madein accordance with the approved plan of operation.(b) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods. </T3>Distribution of donatedfoods shall be based on the actual number of households in need of foodassistance.(c) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>Agencies whichmake distribution to needy persons are eligible to receive foods undersection 416, section 32, section 709 and section 4(a).(d) <T3>Plan of operation. </T3>Prior to making distribution to agencies orhouseholds, the distributing agency shall submit a plan of operation forapproval by the appropriate FNSRO. Such plans shall incorporate the proceduresand methods to be used in certifying households in need of food assistance,in making distribution to households, and in providing a fair hearing tohouseholds whose claims for food assistance under the plan are denied orare not acted upon with reasonable promptness, or who are aggrieved byan agency's interpretation of any provision of the plan. No amendment tothe plan of operation of the distributing agency shall be made withoutprior approval of FNS, and FNS may require amendment of any plan as a conditionof continuing approval. The distributing agency shall require welfare agenciesmaking distribution to households to conduct distribution programs in accordancewith all provisions of the plan of operation. At a minimum, the plan shallinclude the following:(1) The name of the public welfare agency or agencies which will be responsiblefor certification of households;(2) The manner in which donated food will be distributed, including, butnot limited to, the identity of the agency that will distribute donatedfoods, the storage and distribution facilities to be used and the methodof financing;(3) <T3>The specific criteria to be used in certifying households as in needof food assistance. </T3>The income and resource standards establishesby the distributing agency for use by welfare agencies in determining theeligibility of applicant households, after October 1979, shall continueto be those standards used as of that date which were incorporated in aplan of operation approved by FNS, unless an amendment to such standardis required or approved by FNS;(4) The method or methods that will be used to verify the information uponwhich the certification of eligibility is based, including the kinds ofdocumentary evidence that applicants are required to furnish to obtaincertification;(5) Provisions for periodically reviewing the certifications of householdsto discover any change in their status which would necessitate a changein the determination of eligibility. The eligibility of households shallbe reviewed at least every three months, except that such reviews may bemade at longer periods, not to exceed 12 months, provided that such longerperiods are based upon a determination by the certifying agency that theincome and resources available to such households will probably remainessentially unchanged during such period;(6) Provisions for identifying each person who has been designated to receivedonated foods for a household;(7) Assurance that the distribution of donated foods shall not be usedas a means to further the political interest of any individual or party,and that there shall be no discrimination against recipients of donatedfoods because of race, color, national origin, sex, age or handicap;(8) Assurance that:(i) Citizenship or durational residence requirements shall not be imposedas a condition of eligibility and(ii) Recipients shall not be required to make any payments in money, materialsor services, for or in connection with the receipt of donated foods, andthat they shall not be solicited in connection with the receipt of donatedfoods for voluntary cash contributions for any purpose;(9) The manner in which the distributing agency plans to supervise theprogram; and(10) Definitions of any terms used which cannot be determined by referenceto Webster's New International Dictionary (third edition).(e) <T3>Operating expense funds_</T3>(1) <T3>Application for funds. </T3>To receive administrative funds, the distributingagency shall submit Form AD-623, ``Application for Federal Assistance,''to the appropriate FNSRO at least three months prior to the beginning ofthe Federal fiscal year. Approval of the application by FNS shall be aprerequisite to payment of any funds to the distributing agency. The Departmentwill make payments to the distributing agency to assist it in meeting operatingexpenses incurred in administering food distribution for needy persons.(2) <T3>Availability of funds. </T3>FNS will review and evaluate the budgetinformation submitted by the distributing agency in relationship to thedistributing agency's plan of operation and any other factors which maybe relevant to FNS' determination as to whether the estimated expendituresare reasonable and justified. FNS will give written notification to thedistributing agency of:(i) Its approval or disapproval of any or all of the estimated expenditures;and(ii) The amount of funds which will be made available.(3) <T3>Payment of funds. </T3>Payments shall be made to the distributing agencythrough a Letter of Credit or an advance by Treasury Check. These paymentswill be issued in accordance with Treasury Department procedures, TreasuryCircular No. 1075 and through the appropriate Treasury Regional DisbursingOffice (RDO). (4) <T3>Use of funds. </T3>The distributing agency shall make every reasonableeffort to ensure the availability of a food distribution program for needypersons in households and shall assign priority in the use of any fundsreceived under this Section to accomplish that objective. Any remainingfunds shall be used to expand and improve distribution to needy households.Such funds may be used for any costs which are not disallowed under Officeof Management and Budget Circular A-87 (a copy of which may be obtainedfrom FNS) and which are incurred in distributing donated foods to households,including determining eligibility of recipients, except for the purchasecost of land and buildings. In no event shall such funds be used to payany portion of any expenses if reimbursement or payment therefore is claimedor made available from any other Federal source. (5) <T3>Accounting for funds. </T3>The distributing agency which receives administrativefunds under this Section shall establish and maintain an effective systemof fiscal control and accounting procedures. The accounting proceduresmaintained by the distributing agency shall be such as to accurately reflectthe receipt, expenditure and current balance of funds provided by FNS.The accounting procedures shall also provide for segregation of costs specificallyidentifiable to the Food Distribution Program from any other costs incurredby the distributing agency. Any budget revisions by the distributing agencywhich require the transfer of funds from an FNS approved cost categoryto another shall be in accordance with the budget revision procedures setforth in 7 CFR Part 3015 and shall be approved by FNS prior to any transferof funds. (6) <T3>Return, reduction and reallocation of funds. </T3>(i) FNS may requirethe distributing agency to return prior to the end of the Federal fiscalyear any or all unobligated funds received under this section, and mayreduce the amount it has apportioned or agreed to pay to the distributingagency if FNS determines that: (A) The distributing agency is not administering the Food DistributionProgram in accordance with its plan of operation approved by FNS and theprovisions of this Part; (B) The amount of funds which the distributing agency requested from FNSis in excess of actual need, based on reports of expenditures and currentprojections of program needs; or (C) Circumstances or conditions justify the return, reallocation or transferof funds to accomplish the purposes of this Part. (ii) The distributing agency shall return to FNS within 90 days followingthe close of each Federal fiscal year any funds received under paragraph(e) of this section which are obligated at that time. (7) <T3>Financial reports. </T3>The distributing agency shall submit quarterlyand annual reports to FNS on Form SF-269 concerning the obligations, expenditureand status of funds received under this Section. In addition, the distributingagency receiving funds under paragraph (e) of this section shall submitany other reports in such form as may be required from time to time bythe Department. (f) <T3>Records, reports and audits. </T3>The distributing agency shall: (1) Maintain and retain for three years from the close of the Federal fiscalyear to which they pertain, complete and accurate records of all amountsreceived and disbursed under paragraph (e) of this section, (2) Keep such accounts and records as may be necessary to enable FNS todetermine whether there has been compliance with this Section, and (3) Permit representatives of the Department and of a General AccountingOffice of the United States to inspect, audit and copy such records andaccounts at any reasonable time. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.47 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations. </ITAG><T3>Distribution. </T3>(a) Distributing agencies which operate a food distributionprogram on Indian reservation shall comply with the provisions set forthin andSection;andSection; 250.1, 250.2, 250.3, 250.10, 250.11, 250.12, 250.13(with the exception of paragraph (d)(2)), andSection;andSection; 250.14 and250.15 to the extent that these provisions are not inconsistent with theregulations cited in paragraph (b) of this section. (b) In addition tocomplying with the provisions identified in paragraph (a) of this section,distributing agencies shall also comply with the provisions set forth inPart 253, Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations or Part 254,Food Distribution Program in Oklahoma, as applicable. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.48 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">School food authorities and commodity schools. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution. </T3>School food authorities which participate in theNational School Lunch Program or as commodity schools under Part 210 ofthis chapter or the School Breakfast Program under Part 220 of this chapterare eligible to receive donated foods. The distributing agency shall distributedonated foods only to those school food authorities whose eligibility forparticipation in the program has been confirmed in writing by the Stateagency or FNSRO administering the applicable program. Lists of participatingschool food authorities which have been provided to the distributing agencyby the administering State agency or FNSRO may serve as written confirmationof eligibility. School food authorities may employ food service managementcompanies to conduct food service operations in accordance with andSection;250.12(c) and Parts 210 and 220 of this chapter. (b) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods._</T3>(1) <T3>Quantities. </T3>Distribution of donated foods to school food authoritieswhich participate in the National School Lunch Program or as commodityschool under Part 210 shall be made on the basis of the average daily numberof meals by type to be served which meet the meal-type requirements prescribedin the regulations for the National School Lunch Program under Part 210of this chapter, as evidenced by the most recent estimate of the averagedaily numbers of meals which must be provided by the administering Stateagency or FNSRO to the distributing agencies as early as practicable eachschool year but not later than September 1, as revised to reflect additionsor deletions of eligible schools and any necessary adjustment in the numberof meals served.   (2) <T3>Value.</T3> (i) For each school year, the national average value ofdonated foods to be made available to States for distribution to schoolfood authorities participating in the National School Lunch Program (7CFR Part 210), or where applicable, cash payments in lieu thereof, shallnot be less than 11 cents for each lunch and shall be adjusted on July1, 1982, and on each July 1 thereafter, to reflect changes in the PriceIndex for food used in schools and institutions as prescribed by Section6(e) of the National School Lunch Act, as amended. These adjustments shallbe computed to the nearest one-fourth cent and shall be made effectiveas of the beginning of each school year. Not less than 75 percent of thefood distribution assistance shall be in the form of donated foods.(ii) For each school year, the national average value of donated foodsto be provided to States for distribution to commodity schools shall notbe less than the amount specified in paragraph (b)(2)(i) of this section,plus an amount equal to the national average payment established undersection 4 of the National School Lunch Act, as amended, for each lunchserved by such schools: <T3>Provided, however:</T3> That this amount shall be reduced to the extentthat FNS provides up to 5 cents per lunch of this value in cash in lieuof donated foods for donated food processing and handling expenses on behalfof such school food authorities in accordance with Part 240 of this chapter.(c) <T3>Cash in lieu of donated foods for schools.</T3> Where a State has phasedout its food distribution facilities prior to July 1, 1974, such Statemay, in accordance with Part 240 of this chapter, elect to receive cashpayments in lieu of donated foods for use in school lunch programs whichparticipate in the National School Lunch Program under Part 210 of thischapter. (d) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation.</T3> School food authoritieswhich participate in the National School Lunch Program or as commodityschools under Part 210 of this chapter are eligible to receive donatedfoods under section 416, section 32, section 709, section 6 and section14. School food authorities which participate in the School Breakfast Programunder Part 220 are eligible to receive donated foods under section 416,section 32, section 709 and section 14.(e) <T3>Refusal of donated foods by school food authorities.</T3> (1) Any schoolfood authority participating in food service programs under the NationalSchool Lunch Act, as amended, may refuse, at the time they are offered,donated foods and other foods offered for delivery for lunches in any schoolyear if such foods cannot be used effectively. The school food authoritymay receive, in lieu of the refused donated foods, other donated foodsto the extent that they are available during the school year: <T3>Provided, however:</T3> That not more than 20 percent of the valueof the donated foods offered to a school food authority for lunches duringthe school year shall be subject to replacement with other available donatedfoods unless replacement based on the refusal of more than 20 percent ofsuch value is feasible and practical. Prior to making distribution to schoolfood authorities, distributing agencies shall notify each school food authorityof its right to refuse delivery and to receive other donated foods, ifavailable, in lieu of those refused. Notification of donated food refusalrights shall be provided by means of a letter or by an addendum to theagreement required by andSection; 250.12(b) to each school food authorityprior to the beginning of each school year.(2) If the distributing agency demonstrates on the basis of existing recordsthat it is maintaining an effective offer-and-acceptance system as definedin andSection; 250.3, there can be no refusal of donated foods as providedin paragraph (e)(1) of this section.(f) <T3>Use of donated foods in home economics courses.</T3> School food authoritiesreceiving donated foods under this Part may use such foods for the purposeof training students in home economics, including college students if thesame facilities and instructors are used for training both high schooland college students in home economics courses. Home economics includesclasses in general home economics, food purchases, nutrition, food preparation,cooking, child care and health.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.49</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nonresidential child care institutions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution.</T3> The distributing agency shall distribute donatedfoods only to those nonresidential child care institutions whose eligibilityfor participation in Child Care Food Program has been confirmed in writingby the State agency of FNSRO administering the program, where applicable.Lists of participating nonresidential child care institutions which havebeen prepared by the administering State agency or FNSRO may serve as writtenconfirmation of eligibility. Nonresidential child care institutions mayemploy food service management companies to conduct food service operationsin accordance with andSection; 250.12(c) and Part 226 of this chapter.(b) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods.</T3> (1) <T3>Quantities.</T3> Distribution of donated foods to nonresidential childcare institutions shall be made on the basis of the average daily numberof lunches and suppers to be served which meet the meal-type requirementsprescribed in the regulations for the Child Care Food Program under Part226 of this chapter, as evidenced by the most recent written caseload factorinformation which must be provided by the administering State agency orFNSRO to the distributing agency not later than June 1 each year.(2) <T3>Value.</T3> For each school year, the national average value of donatedfoods to be made available to States for distribution to nonresidentialchild care institutions, or cash payments in lieu thereof, shall not beless than 11 cents for each lunch and supper and shall be adjusted on July1, 1982, and on each July 1 thereafter, to reflect changes in the PriceIndex for food used in schools and institutions as prescribed by section6(e) of the National School Lunch Act, as amended. These adjustments shallbe computed to the nearest one-fourth cent and shall be made effectiveat the beginning of each school year.(c) <T3>Cash in lieu of donated foods. </T3>In accordance with Part 240 ofthis chapter, State agencies may elect to receive cash payments in lieuof donated foods for use by institutions which participate in the ChildCare Food Program under Part 226 of this chapter. (d) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donations. </T3>Nonresidentialchild care institutions which participate in the Child Care Food Programunder Part 226 of this chapter are eligible to receive donated foods undersection 416, section 32, section 709, section 6 and section 14. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service institutions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution. </T3>The distributing agency shall distribute donatedfoods only to those service institutions whose eligibility to receive donatedfoods for use in the Summer Food Service Program for Children under Part225 of this chapter has been confirmed in writing by the State agency orFNSRO administering the program, where applicable. Lists of participatingservice institutions which have been prepared by the administering Stateagency or FNSRO may serve as written confirmation of eligibility. (b) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods. </T3>Distribution of donatedfoods to service institutions shall be made on the basis of the averagedaily number of meals by type to be served which meet the meal-type requirementsprescribed in the regulations for the Summer Food Service Program for Childrenunder Part 225 of this chapter as evidenced by the most recent writtencaseload factor information which must be provided by the State agencyor FNSRO administering the program to the distributing agency by June 1of each year. (c) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>Service institutionswhich participate in the Summer Food Service Program for Children underPart 225 of this chapter are eligible to receive donated foods under section416, section 32, section 709, and section 14.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants and Children.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Distribution. </T3>At the request of the State agency responsible foradministering the Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infantsand Children (WIC Program) under part 246 of this chapter and with approvalof the Department, donated foods may be made available for distributionto program participants. In instances when donated foods are made available,State agencies shall pay the Department using funds allocated to the Statefor the WIC Program for those donated foods which are provided to participantsas part of the food package. Donated foods which are provided to participantsin addition to the quantities authorized for the food package will be madeavailable to the State agency free of charge. (b) <T3>Quantities and value of donated foods. </T3>Distribution of donatedfoods to State agencies for the WIC Program shall be made on the basisof each State agency's quarterly estimate of need. (c) <T3>Types of donated foods authorized for donation. </T3>State agenciesparticipating in the WIC Program under Part 246 of this chapter are eligibleto receive donated foods under section 416 and section 32.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Where to Obtain Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program information.</ITAG>Interested persons desiring information concerning the program may makewritten request to the following Regional Offices:(a) Northeast Region, Food and Nutrition Service, USDA, 10 Causeway Street,Boston, Massachusetts 02222-1065 for the following States: Connecticut,Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, New York, Rhode Island and Vermont.(b) Mid-Atlantic Region, Food and Nutrition Service, USDA, Mercer CorporatePark, Corporate Blvd., CN 02150, Trenton, New Jersey 08650, for the followingStates: Delaware, District of Columbia, Maryland, New Jersey, Pennsylvania,Puerto Rico, Virginia, Virgin Islands and West Virginia. (c) Southeast Region, Food and Nutrition Service, USDA, 1100 Spring Street,NW, Atlanta, Georgia 30367, for the following States: Alabama, Florida,Georgia, Kentucky, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee.(d) Midwest Region, Food and Nutrition Service, USDA, 50 East WashingtonStreet, Chicago, Illinois 60602, for the following States: Illinois, Indiana,Michigan, Minnesota, Ohio and Wisconsin.(e) Mountain Plains Region, Food and Nutrition Service, USDA, 2420 West26th Avenue, Room 430-D, Denver, Colorado 80211, for the following States:Colorado, Iowa, Kansas, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, North Dakota, SouthDakota, Utah and Wyoming. (f) Southwest Region, Food and Nutrition Service, USDA, 1100 Commerce Street,Room 5-C-30, Dallas, Texas 75242, for the following States: Arkansas, Louisiana,New Mexico, Oklahoma and Texas. (g) Western Region, Food and Nutrition Service, USDA, 550 Kearney Street,Room 400, San Francisco, California 94108 for the following States: Alaska,American Samoa, Arizona, California, Guam, Hawaii, Idaho, Nevada, Oregon,Trust Territory and Washington.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: May 25, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Anna Kondratas,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-12220 Filed 6-2-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-30-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>